1	1	Adam, Seth, Enos,
1	2	Cainan, Malaleel, Jared,
1	3	Henoc, Mathusale, Lamech,
1	4	Noe, Sem, Cham, and Japheth.
1	5	The sons of Japheth: Gomer, and Magog, and Madai, and Javan, Thubal, Mosoch, Thiras.
1	6	And the sons of Gomer: Ascenez, and Riphath, and Thogorma.
1	7	And the sons of Javan: Elisa and Tharsis, Cethim and Dodanim.
1	8	The sons of Cham: Chus, and Mesrai, and Phut, and Chanaan.
1	9	And the sons of Chus: Saba, and Hevila, Sabatha, and Regma, and Sabathaca. And the sons of Regma: Saba, and Dadan.
1	10	Now Chus begot Nemrod: he began to be mighty upon earth.
1	11	But Mesraim begot Ludim, and Anamim, and Laabim, and Nephtuim,
1	12	Phetrusim also, and Casluim: from whom came the Philistines, and Caphtorim.
1	13	And Chanaan begot Sidon his firstborn, and the Hethite,
1	14	And the Jebusite, and the Amorrhite, and the Gergesite,
1	15	And the Hevite, and the Aracite, and the Sinite,
1	16	And the Aradian, and the Samarite, and the Hamathite.
1	17	The sons of Sem: Elam and Asur, and Arphaxad, and Lud, and Aram, and Hus, and Hul, and Gether, and Mosoch.
1	18	And Arphaxad begot Sale, and Sale begot Heber.
1	19	And to Heber were born two sons, the name of the one was Phaleg, because in his days the earth was divided; and the name of his brother was Jectan.
1	20	And Jectan begot Elmodad, and Saleph, and Asarmoth, and Jare,
1	21	And Adoram, and Usal, and Decla,
1	22	And Hebal, and Abimael, and Saba,
1	23	And Ophir, and Hevila, and Jobab. All these are the sons of Jectan.
1	24	Sem, Arphaxad, Sale,
1	25	Heber, Phaleg, Ragau,
1	26	Serug, Nachor, Thare,
1	27	Abram, this is Abraham.
1	28	And the sons of Abraham, Isaac and Ismahel.
1	29	And these are the generations of them. The firstborn of Ismahel, Nabajoth, then Cedar, and Adbeel, and Mabsam,
1	30	And Masma, and Duma, Massa, Hadad, and Thema,
1	31	Jetur, Naphis, Cedma: these are the sons of Ismahel.
1	32	And the sons of Cetura, Abraham’s concubine, whom she bore: Zamran, Jecsan, Madan, Madian, Jesboc, and Sue. And the sons of Jecsan, Saba, and Dadan. And the sons of Dadan: Assurim, and Latussim, and Laomin.
1	33	And the sons of Madian: Epha, and Epher, and Henoch, and Abida, and Eldaa. All these are the sons of Cetura.
1	34	And Abraham begot Isaac: and his sons were Esau and Israel.
1	35	The sons of Esau: Eliphaz, Rahuel, Jehus, Ihelom, and Core.
1	36	The sons of Eliphaz: Theman, Omar, Sephi, Gathan, Cenez, and by Thamna, Amalec.
1	37	The sons of Rahuel: Nahath, Zara, Samma, Meza.
1	38	The sons of Seir: Lotan, Sobal, Sebeon, Ana, Dison, Eser, Disan.
1	39	The sons of Lotan: Hori, Homam. And the sister of Lotan was Thamna.
1	40	The sons of Sobal: Alian, and Manahath, and Ebal, Sephi, and Onam. The sons of Sebeon: Aia, and Ana. The son of Ana: Dison.
1	41	The sons of Dison: Hamram, and Eseban, and Jethran, and Charan.
1	42	The sons of Eser: Balaan, and Zavan, and Jacan. The sons of Disan: Hus and Aran.
1	43	Now these are the kings that reigned in the land of Edom, before there was a king over the children of Israel: Bale the son of Beor: and the name of his city was Denaba.
1	44	And Bale died, and Jobab the son of Zare of Bosra, reigned in his stead.
1	45	And when Jobab also was dead, Husam of the land of the Themanites reigned in his stead.
1	46	And Husam also died, and Adad the son of Badad reigned in his stead, and he defeated the Madianites in the land of Moab: the name of his city was Avith.
1	47	And when Adad also was dead, Semla of Masreca reigned in his stead.
1	48	Semla also died, and Saul of Rohoboth, which is near the river, reigned in his stead.
1	49	And when Saul was dead, Balanan the son of Achobor reigned in his stead.
1	50	He also died, and Adad reigned in his stead: and the name of his city was Phau, and his wife was called Meetabel the daughter of Matred, the daughter of Mezaab.
1	51	And after the death of Adad, there began to be dukes in Edom instead of kings: duke Thamna, duke Alva, duke Jetheth,
1	52	Duke Oolibama, duke Ela, duke Phinon,
1	53	Duke Cenez, duke Theman, duke Mabsar,
1	54	Duke Magdiel, duke Hiram. These are the dukes of Edom.
2	1	And these are the sons of Israel: Ruben, Simeon, Levi, Juda, Issachar, and Zabulon,
2	2	Dan, Joseph, Benjamin, Nephtali, Gad, and Aser.
2	3	The sons of Juda: Her, Onan and Sela. These three were born to him of the Chanaanitess the daughter of Sue. And Her the firstborn of Juda, was wicked in the sight of the Lord, and he slew him.
2	4	And Thamar his daughter-in-law bore him Phares and Zara. So all the sons of Juda were five.
2	5	And the sons of Phares, were Hesron and Hamul.
2	6	And the sons also of Zare: Zamri, and Ethan, and Eman, and Chalchal, and Dara, five in all.
2	7	And the sons of Charmi: Achar, who troubled Israel, and sinned by the theft of the anathema.
2	8	The sons of Ethan: Azarias,
2	9	And the sons of Hesron that were born to him: Jerameel, and Ram, and Calubi.
2	10	And Ram begot Aminadab, and Aminadab begot Nahasson, prince of the children of Juda.
2	11	And Nahasson begot Salma, the father of Booz.
2	12	And Booz begot Obed, and Obed begot Isai.
2	13	And Isai begot Eliab his firstborn, the second Abinadab, the third Simmaa,
2	14	The fourth, Nathanael, the fifth Raddai,
2	15	The sixth Asom, the seventh David.
2	16	And their sisters were Sarvia, and Abigail. The sons of Sarvia: Abisai, Joab, and Asael, three.
2	17	And Abigail bore Amasa, whose father was Jether the Ismahelite.
2	18	And Caleb the son of Hesron took a wife named Azuba, of whom he had Jerioth: and her sons were Jaser, and Sobab, and Ardon.
2	19	And when Azuba was dead, Caleb took to wife Ephrata: who bore him Hur.
2	20	And Hur begot Uri: and Uri begot Bezeleel.
2	21	And afterwards Hesron went in to the daughter of Machir the father of Galaad, and took her to wife when he was threescore years old: and she bore him Segub.
2	22	And Segub begot Jair, and he had three and twenty cities in the land of Galaad.
2	23	And he took Gessur, and Aram the towns of Jair, and Canath, and the villages thereof, threescore cities. All these, the sons of Machir father of Galaad.
2	24	And when Hesron was dead, Caleb went in to Ephrata. Hesron also had to wife Abia who bore him Ashur the father of Thecua.
2	25	And the sons of Jerameel the firstborn of Hesron, were Ram his firstborn, and Buna, and Aram, and Asom, and Achia.
2	26	And Jerameel married another wife, named Atara, who was the mother of Onam.
2	27	And the sons of Ram the firstborn of Jerameel, were Moos, Jamin, and Achar.
2	28	And Onam had sons Semei, and Jada. And the sons of Semei: Nadab, and Abisur.
2	29	And the name of Abisur’s wife was Abihail, who bore him Ahobban, and Molid.
2	30	And the sons of Nadab were Saled and Apphaim. And Saled died without children.
2	31	But the son of Apphaim was Jesi: and Jesi begot Sesan. And Sesan begot Oholai.
2	32	And the sons of Jada the brother of Semei: Jether and Jonathan. And Jether also died without children.
2	33	But Jonathan begot Phaleth, and Ziza. These were the sons of Jerameel.
2	34	And Sesan had no sons, but daughters and a servant an Egyptian, named Jeraa.
2	35	And he gave him his daughter to wife: and she bore him Ethei.
2	36	And Ethei begot Nathan, and Nathan begot Zabad.
2	37	And Zabad begot Ophlal, and Ophlal begot Obed.
2	38	Obed begot Jehu, Jehu begot Azarias.
2	39	Azarias begot Helles, and Helles begot Elasa.
2	40	Elasa begot Sisamoi, Sisamoi begot Sellum,
2	41	Sellum begot Icamia, and Icamia begot Elisama.
2	42	Now the sons of Caleb the brother of Jerameel were Mesa his firstborn, who was the father of Siph: and the sons of Maresa father of Hebron.
2	43	And the sons of Hebron, Core, and Thaphua, and Recem, and Samma.
2	44	And Samma begot Raham, the father of Jercaam, and Recem begot Sammai.
2	45	The son of Sammai, Maon: and Maon the father of Bethsur.
2	46	And Epha the concubine of Caleb bore Haran, and Mosa, and Gezez. And Haran begot Gezez.
2	47	And the sons of Jahaddai, Rogom, and Joathan, and Gesan, and Phalet, and Epha, and Saaph.
2	48	And Maacha the concubine of Caleb bore Saber, and Tharana.
2	49	And Saaph the father of Madmena begot Sue the father of Machbena, and the father of Gabaa. And the daughter of Caleb was Achsa.
2	50	These were the sons of Caleb, the son of Hur the firstborn of Ephrata, Sobal the father of Cariathiarim.
2	51	Salma the father of Bethlehem, Hariph the father of Bethgader.
2	52	And Sobal the father of Cariathiarim had sons: he that saw half of the places of rest.
2	53	And of the kindred of Cariathiarim, the Jethrites, and Aphuthites, and Semathites, and Maserites. Of them came the Saraites, and Esthaolites.
2	54	The sons of Salma, Bethlehem, and Netophathi, the crowns of the house of Joab, and half of the place of rest of Sarai.
2	55	And the families of the scribes that dwell in Jabes, singing and making melody, and abiding in tents. These are the Cinites, who came of Calor (Chamath) father of the house of Rechab.
3	1	Now these were the sons of David that were born to him in Hebron: the firstborn Amnon of Achinoam the Jezrahelitess, the second Daniel of Abigail the Carmelitess.
3	2	The third Absalom the son of Maacha the daughter of Tolmai king of Gessur, the fourth Adonias the son of Aggith,
3	3	The fifth Saphatias of Abital, the sixth Jethrahem of Egla his wife.
3	4	So six sons were born to him in Hebron, where he reigned seven years and six months. And in Jerusalem he reigned three and thirty years.
3	5	And these sons were born to him in Jerusalem: Simmaa, and Sobab, and Nathan, and Solomon, four of Bethsabee the daughter of Ammiel.
3	6	Jebaar also and Elisama,
3	7	And Eliphaleth, and Noge, and Nepheg, and Japhia,
3	8	And Elisama, and Eliada, and Elipheleth, nine:
3	9	All these the sons of David, beside the sons of the concubines: and they had a sister Thamar.
3	10	And Solomon’s son was Roboam: whose son Abia begot Asa. And his son was Josaphat,
3	11	The father of Joram: and Joram begot Ochozias, of whom was born Joas:
3	12	And his son Amasias begot Azarias. And Joathan the son of Azarias
3	13	Begot Achaz, the father of Ezechias, of whom was born Manasses.
3	14	And Manasses begot Amon the father of Josias.
3	15	And the sons of Josias were, the firstborn Johanan, the second Joakim, the third Sedecias, the fourth Sellum.
3	16	Of Joakim was born Jechonias, and Sedecias.
3	17	The sons of Jechonias were Asir, Salathiel,
3	18	Melchiram, Phadaia, Senneser and Jecemia, Sama, and Nadabia.
3	19	Of Phadaia were born Zorobabel and Semei. Zorobabel begot Mosollam, Hananias, and Salomith their sister:
3	20	Hasaba also, and Ohol, and Barachias, and Hasadias, Josabhesed, five.
3	21	And the son of Hananias was Phaltias the father of Jeseias, whose son was Raphaia. And his son was Arnan, of whom was born Obdia, whose son was Sechenias.
3	22	The son of Sechenias was Semeia, whose sons were Hattus, and Jegaal, and Baria, and Naaria, and Saphat, six in number.
3	23	The sons of Naaria, Elioenai, and Ezechias, and Ezricam, three.
3	24	The sons of Elioenai, Oduia, and Eliasub, and Pheleia, and Accub, and Johanan, and Dalaia, and Anani, seven.
4	1	The sons of Juda: Phares, Hesron, and Charmi and Hur, and Sobal.
4	2	And Raia the son of Sobal begot Jahath, of whom were born Ahumai, and Laad. These are the families of Sarathi.
4	3	And this is the posterity of Etam: Jezrahel, and Jesema, And Jedebos: and the name of their sister was Asalelphuni.
4	4	And Phanuel the father of Gedor, and Ezar the father of Hosa, these are the sons of Hur the firstborn of Ephratha the father of Bethlehem.
4	5	And Assur the father of Thecua had two wives, Halaa and Naara:
4	6	And Naara bore him Ozam, and Hepher, and Themani, and Ahasthari: these are the sons of Naara.
4	7	And the sons of Halaa, Sereth, Isaar, and Ethnan.
4	8	And Cos begot Anob, and Soboba, and the kindred of Aharehel the son of Arum.
4	9	And Jabes was more honourable than any of his brethren, and his mother called his name Jabes, saying: Because I bore him with sorrow.
4	10	And Jabes called upon the God of Israel, saying: If blessing thou wilt bless me, and wilt enlarge my borders, and thy hand be with me, and thou save me from being oppressed by evil. And God granted him the things he prayed for.
4	11	And Caleb the brother of Sua begot Mahir, who was the father of Esthon.
4	12	And Esthon begot Bethrapha, and Phesse, and Tehinna father of the city of Naas: these are the men of Recha.
4	13	And the sons of Cenez were Othoniel, and Saraia. And the sons of Othoniel, Hathath, and Maonathi.
4	14	Maonathi begot Ophra, and Saraia begot Joab the father of the Valley of artificers: for artificers were there.
4	15	And the sons of Caleb the son of Jephone, were Hir, and Ela, and Naham. And the sons of Ela: Cenez.
4	16	The sons also of Jaleleel: Ziph, and Zipha, Thiria and Asrael.
4	17	And the sons of Esra, Jether, and Mered, and Epher, and Jalon, and he begot Mariam, and Sammai, and Jesba the father of Esthamo.
4	18	And his wife Judaia, bore Jared the father of Gedor, and Heber the father of Socho, and Icuthiel the father of Zanoe. And these are the sons of Bethia the daughter of Pharao, whom Mered took to wife.
4	19	And the sons of his wife Odaia the sister of Naham the father of Celia, Garmi, and Esthamo, who was of Machathi.
4	20	The sons also of Simon, Amnon, and Rinna the son of Hanan, and Thilon. And the sons of Jesi Zoheth, and Benzoheth.
4	21	The sons of Sela the son of Juda: Her the father of Lecha, and Laada the father of Maresa, and the families of the house of them that wrought fine linen in the House of oath.
4	22	And he that made the sun to stand, and the men of Lying, and Secure, and Burning, who were princes in Moab, and who returned into Lahem. Now these are things of old.
4	23	These are the potters, and they dwelt in Plantations, and Hedges, with the king for his works, and they abode there.
4	24	The sons of Simeon: Namuel and Jamin, Jarib, Zara, Saul:
4	25	Sellum his son, Mapsam his son, Masma his son.
4	26	The sons of Masma: Hamuel his son, Zachur his son, Semei his son.
4	27	The sons of Semei were sixteen, and six daughters: but his brethren had not many sons, and the whole kindred could not reach to the sum of the children of Juda.
4	28	And they dwelt in Bersabee, and Molada, and Hasarsuhal,
4	29	And in Bala, and in Asom, and in Tholad,
4	30	And in Bathuel, and in Horma, and in Siceleg,
4	31	And in Bethmarchaboth, and in Hasarsusim, and in Bethberai, and in Saarim. These were their cities unto the reign of David.
4	32	Their towns also were Etam, and Aen, Remmon, and Thochen, and Asan, five cities.
4	33	And all their villages round about these cities as far as Baal. This was their habitation, and the distribution of their dwellings.
4	34	And Mosabab and Jemlech, and Josaphat, the son of Amasias,
4	35	And Joel, and Jehu the son of Josabia the son of Saraia, the son of Asiel,
4	36	And Elioenai, and Jacoba, and Isuhaia, and Asaia, and Adiel, and Ismiel, and Banaia,
4	37	Ziza also the son of Sephei the son of Allon the son of Idaia the son of Semri the son of Samaia.
4	38	These were named princes in their kindreds, and in the houses of their families were multiplied exceedingly.
4	39	And they went forth to enter into Gador as far as to the east side of the valley, to seek pastures for their flocks.
4	40	And they found fat pastures, and very good, and a country spacious, and quiet, and fruitful, in which some of the race of Cham had dwelt before.
4	41	And these whose names are written above, came in the days of Ezechias king of Juda: and they beat down their tents, and slew the inhabitants that were found there, and utterly destroyed them unto this day: and they dwelt in their place, because they found there fat pastures.
4	42	Some also of the children of Simeon, five hundred men, went into mount Seir, having for their captains Phaltias and Naaria and Raphaia and Oziel the sons of Jesi:
4	43	And they slew the remnant of the Amalecites, who had been able to escape, and they dwelt there in their stead unto this day.
5	1	Now the sons of Ruben the firstborn of Israel, (for he was his firstborn: but forasmuch as he defiled his father’s bed, his first birthright was given to the sons of Joseph the son of Israel, and he was not accounted for the firstborn.
5	2	But of the race of Juda, who was the strongest among his brethren, came the princes: but the first birthright was accounted to Joseph.)
5	3	The sons then of Ruben the firstborn of Israel were Enoch, and Phallu, Esron, and Charmi.
5	4	The sons of Joel: Samaia his son, Gog his son, Semei his son,
5	5	Micha his son, Reia his son, Baal his son,
5	6	Beera his son, whom Thelgathphalnasar king of the Assyrians carried away captive, and he was prince in the tribe of Ruben.
5	7	And his brethren, and all his kindred, when they were numbered by their families, had for princes Jehiel, and Zacharias.
5	8	And Bala the son of Azaz, the son of Samma, the son of Joel, dwelt in Aroer as far as Nebo, and Beelmeon.
5	9	And eastward he had his habitation as far as the entrance of the desert, and the river Euphrates. For they possessed a great number of cattle in the land of Galaad.
5	10	And in the days of Saul they fought against the Agarites, and slew them, and dwelt in their tents in their stead, in all the country, that looketh to the east of Galaad.
5	11	And the children of Gad dwelt over against them in the land of Basan, as far as Selcha:
5	12	Johel the chief, and Saphan the second: and Janai, and Saphat in Basan.
5	13	And their brethren according to the houses of their kindreds, were Michael and Mosollam, and Sebe, and Jorai, and Jacan, and Zie, and Heber, seven.
5	14	These were the sons of Abihail, the son of Huri, the son of Jara, the son of Galaad, the son of Michael, the son of Jesisi, the son of Jeddo, the son of Buz.
5	15	And their brethren the sons of Abdiel, the son of Guni, chief of the house in their families,
5	16	And they dwelt in Galaad, and in Basan and in the towns thereof, and in all the suburbs of Saron, unto the borders.
5	17	All these were numbered in the days of Joathan king of Juda, and in the days of Jeroboam king of Israel.
5	18	The Sons of Ruben, and of Gad, and of the half tribe of Manasses, fighting men, bearing shields, and swords, and bending the bow, and trained up to battles, four and forty thousand seven hundred and threescore that went out to war.
5	19	They fought against the Agarites: but the Itureans, and Naphis, and Nodab,
5	20	Gave them help. And the Agarites were delivered into their hands, and all that were with them, because they called upon God in the battle: and he heard them, because they had put their faith in him.
5	21	And they took all that they possessed, of camels fifty thousand, and of sheep two hundred and fifty thousand, and of asses two thousand, and of men a hundred thousand souls.
5	22	And many fell down slain: for it was the battle of the Lord. And they dwelt in their stead till the captivity.
5	23	And the children of the half tribe of Manasses possessed the land, from the borders of Basan unto Baal, Hermon, and Sanir, and mount Hermon, for their number was great.
5	24	And these were the heads of the house of their kindred, Epher, and Jesi, and Eliel, and Esriel, and Jeremia, and Odoia, and Jediel, most valiant and powerful men, and famous chiefs in their families.
5	25	But they forsook the God of their fathers, and went astray after the gods of the people of the land, whom God destroyed before them.
5	26	And the God of Israel stirred up the spirit of Phul king of the Assyrians, and the spirit of Thelgathphalnasar king of Assur: and he carried away Ruben, and Gad, and the half tribe of Manasses, and brought them to Lahela, and to Habor, and to Ara, and to the river of Gozan, unto this day.
6	1	The sons of Levi were Gerson, Caath, and Merari.
6	2	The Sons of Caath: Amram, Isaar, Hebron, and Oziel.
6	3	The children of Amram: Aaron, Moses, and Mary. The Sons of Aaron: Nadab and Abiu, Eleazar and Ithamar.
6	4	Eleazar begot Phinees, and Phinees begot Abisue,
6	5	And Abisue begot Bocci, and Bocci begot Ozi.
6	6	Ozi begot Zaraias, and Zaraias begot Maraioth.
6	7	And Maraioth begot Amarias, and Amarias begot Achitob.
6	8	Achitob begot Sadoc, and Sadoc begot Achimaas.
6	9	Achimaas begot Azarias, Azarias begot Johanan,
6	10	Johanan begot Azarias. This is he that executed the priestly office in the house which Solomon built in Jerusalem.
6	11	And Azarias begot Amarias, and Amarias begot Achitob.
6	12	And Achitob begot Sadoc, and Sadoc begot Sellum,
6	13	Sellum begot Helcias, and Helcias begot Azarias,
6	14	Azarias begot Saraias, and Saraias begot Josedec.
6	15	Now Josedec went out, when the Lord carried away Juda, and Jerusalem, by the hands of Nabuchodonosor.
6	16	So the sons of Levi were Gerson, Caath, and Merari.
6	17	And these are the names of the sons of Gerson: Lobni and Semei.
6	18	The sons of Caath: Amram, and Isaar, and Hebron, and Oziel.
6	19	The sons of Merari: Moholi and Musi. And these are the kindreds of Levi according to their families.
6	20	Of Gerson: Lobni his son, Jahath his son, Zamma his son,
6	21	Joah his son, Addo his son, Zara his son, Jethrai his son.
6	22	The sons of Caath, Aminadab his son, Core his son, Asir his son,
6	23	Elcana his son, Abiasaph his son, Asir his son,
6	24	Thahath his son, Uriel his son, Ozias his son, Saul his son.
6	25	The sons of Elcana: Amasai, and Achimoth.
6	26	And Elcana. The sons of Elcana: Sophai his son, Nahath his son,
6	27	Eliab his son, Jeroham his son, Elcana his son.
6	28	The sons of Samuel: the firstborn Vasseni, and Abia.
6	29	And the sons of Merari, Moholi: Lobni his son, Semei his son, Oza his son,
6	30	Sammaa his son, Haggia his son, Asaia his son.
6	31	These are they, whom David set over the singing men of the house of the Lord, after that the ark was placed.
6	32	And they ministered before the tabernacle of the testimony, with singing, until Solomon built the house of the Lord in Jerusalem, and they stood according to their order in the ministry.
6	33	And these are they that stood with their sons, of the sons of Caath, Hemam a singer, the son of Joel, the son of Sammuel,
6	34	The son of Elcana, the son of Jeroham, the son of Eliel, the son of Thohu,
6	35	The son of Suph, the son of Elcana, the son of Mahath, the son of Amasai,
6	36	The son of Elcana, the son of Johel, the son of Azarias, the son of Sophonias,
6	37	The son of Thahath, the son of Asir, the son of Abiasaph, the son of Core,
6	38	The son of Isaar, the son of Caath, the son of Levi, the son of Israel.
6	39	And his brother Asaph, who stood on his right hand, Asaph the son of Barachias, the son of Samaa.
6	40	The son of Michael, the son of Basaia, the, son of Melchia.
6	41	The son of Athanai, the son of Zara, the son of Adaia.
6	42	The son of Ethan, the son of Zamma, the son of Semei.
6	43	The son of Jeth, the son of Gerson, the son of Levi.
6	44	And the sons of Merari their brethren, on the left hand, Ethan the son of Cusi, the son of Abdi, the son of Meloch,
6	45	The son of Hasabia, the son of Amasai, the son of Helcias,
6	46	The son of Amasai, the son of Boni, the son of Somer,
6	47	The son of Moholi, the son of Musi, the son of Merari, the son of Levi.
6	48	Their brethren also the Levites, who were appointed for all the ministry of the tabernacle of the house of the Lord.
6	49	But Aaron and his sons offered burnt offerings upon the altar of holocausts, and upon the altar of incense, for every work of the holy of holies: and to pray for Israel according to all that Moses the servant of God had commanded.
6	50	And these are the sons of Aaron: Eleazar his son, Phinees his son, Abisue his son,
6	51	Bocci his son, Ozi his son, Zarahia his son,
6	52	Meraioth his son, Amarias his son, Achitob his son,
6	53	Sadoc his son, Achimaas his son.
6	54	And these are their dwelling places by the towns and confines, to wit, of the sons of Aaron, of the families of the Caathites: for they fell to them by lot.
6	55	And they gave them Hebron in the land of Juda, and the suburbs thereof round about:
6	56	But the fields of the city, and the villages to Caleb son of Jephone.
6	57	And to the sons of Aaron they gave the cities for refuge Hebron, and Lobna, and the suburbs thereof,
6	58	And Jether and Esthemo, with their suburbs, and Helon, and Dabir with their suburbs:
6	59	Asan also, and Bethsames, with their suburbs.
6	60	And out of the tribe of Benjamin: Gabee and its suburbs, Almath with its suburbs, Anathoth also with its suburbs: all their cities throughout their families were thirteen.
6	61	And to the sons of Caath that remained of their kindred they gave out of the half tribe of Manasses ten cities in possession.
6	62	And to the sons of Gerson by their families out of the tribe of Issachar, and out of the tribe of Aser, and out of the tribe of Nephtali, and out of the tribe Manasses in Basan, thirteen cities.
6	63	And to the sons of Merari by their families out of the tribe of Ruben, and out of the tribe of Gad, and out of the tribe of Zabulon, they gave by lot twelve cities.
6	64	And the children of Israel gave to the Levites the cities, and their suburbs.
6	65	And they gave them by lot, out of the tribe of the sons of Juda, and out of the tribe of the sons of Simeon, and out of the tribe of the sons of Benjamin, these cities which they called by their names.
6	66	And to them that were of the kindred of the sons of Caath, and the cities in their borders were of the tribe of Ephraim.
6	67	And they gave the cities of refuge Sichem with its suburbs in mount Ephraim, and Gazer with its suburbs,
6	68	Jecmaan also with its suburbs, and Beth-horon in like manner,
6	69	Helon also with its suburbs, and Gethremmon in like manner,
6	70	And out of the half tribe of Manasses, Aner and its suburbs, Baalam and its suburbs, to wit, to them that were left of the family of the sons of Caath.
6	71	And to the sons of Gersom, out the kindred of the half tribe of Manasses, Gaulon, in Basan, and its suburbs, and Astharoth with its suburbs.
6	72	Out of the tribe of Issachar, Cedes and its suburbs, and Dabereth with its suburbs;
6	73	Ramoth also and its suburbs, and Anem with its suburbs.
6	74	And out of the tribe of Aser: Masal with its suburbs, and Abdon in like manner;
6	75	Hucac also and its suburbs, and Rohol with its suburbs.
6	76	And out of the tribe of Nephtali, Cedes in Galilee and its suburbs, Hamon with its suburbs, and Cariathaim, and its suburbs.
6	77	And to the sons of Merari that remained: out of the tribe of Zabulon, Remmono and its suburbs, and Thabor with its suburbs.
6	78	Beyond the Jordan also over against Jericho, on the east side of the Jordan and out of the tribe of Ruben, Bosor in the wilderness with its suburbs, and Jassa with its suburbs;
6	79	Cademoth also and its suburbs, and Mephaath with its suburbs;
6	80	Moreover also out of the tribe of Gad, Ramoth in Galaad and its suburbs, and Manaim with its suburbs;
6	81	Hesebon also with its suburbs, and Jazer with its suburbs.
7	1	Now the sons of Issachar were Thola, and Phua, Jasub and Simeron, four.
7	2	The sons of Thola: Ozi and Raphaia, and Jeriel, and Jemai, and Jebsem, and Samuel, chiefs of the houses of their kindreds. Of the posterity of Thola were numbered in the days of David, two and twenty thousand six hundred most valiant men.
7	3	The sons of Ozi: Izrahia, of whom were born Michael, and Obadia, and Joel, and Jesia, five all great men.
7	4	And there were with them by their families and peoples, six and thirty thousand most valiant men ready for war: for they had many wives and children.
7	5	Their brethren also throughout all the house of Issachar, were numbered fourscore and seven thousand most valiant men for war.
7	6	The sons of Benjamin were Bela, and Bechor, and Jadihel, three.
7	7	The sons of Bela: Esbon, and Ozi, and Ozial, and Jerimoth and Urai, five chiefs of their families, and most valiant warriors, and their number was twenty-two thousand and thirty-four.
7	8	And the sons of Bechor were Zamira, and Joas, and Eliezer, and Elioenai, and Amai, and Jerimoth, and Abia, and Anathoth, and Almath: all these were the sons of Bechor.
7	9	And they were numbered by the families, heads of their kindreds, most valiant men for war, twenty thousand and two hundred.
7	10	And the son of Jadihel: Balan. And the sons of Balan: Jehus and Benjamin, and Aod, and Chanana, and Zethan and Tharsis, and Ahisahar.
7	11	All these were sons of Jadihel, heads of their kindreds, most valiant men, seventeen thousand and two hundred fifty to go out to war.
7	12	Sepham also and Hapham the sons of Hir: and Hasim the sons of Aher.
7	13	And the sons of Nephtali were Jasiel, and Guni, and Jezer, and Sellum, sons of Bala.
7	14	And the son of Manasses, Ezriel: and his concubine the Syrian bore Machir the father of Galaad.
7	15	And Machir took wives for his sons Happhim, and Saphan: and he had a sister named Maacha: the name of the second was Salphaad, and Salphaad had daughters.
7	16	And Maacha the wife of Machir bore a son, and she called his name Phares: and the name of his brother was Sares: and his sons were Ulam and Recen.
7	17	And the son of Ulam, Baden. These are the sons of Galaad, the son of Machir, the son of Manasses.
7	18	And his sister named Queen bore Goodlyman, and Abiezer, and Mohola.
7	19	And the sons of Semida were Ahiu, and Sechem, and Leci and Aniam.
7	20	And the sons of Ephraim were Suthala, Bared his son, Thahath his son, Elada his son, Thahath his son, and his son Zabad,
7	21	And his son Suthala, and his son Ezer, and Elad: and the men of Geth born in the land slew them, because they came down to invade their possessions.
7	22	And Ephraim their father mourned many days, and his brethren came to comfort him.
7	23	And he went in to his wife: and she conceived and bore a son, and he called his name Beria, because he was born when it went evil with his house:
7	24	And his daughter was Sara, who built Bethoron, the nether and the upper, and Ozensara.
7	25	And Rapha was his son, and Reseph, and Thale, of whom was born Thaan,
7	26	Who begot Laadan: and his son was Ammiud, who begot Elisama,
7	27	Of whom was born Nun, who had Josue for his son.
7	28	And their possessions and habitations were Bethel with her daughters, and eastward Noran, and westward Gazer and her daughters, Sichem also with her daughters, as far as Asa with her daughters.
7	29	And by the borders of the sons of Manasses Bethsan and her daughters, Thanach and her daughters, Mageddo and her daughters: Dor and her daughters: in these dwelt the children of Joseph, the son of Israel.
7	30	The children of Aser were Jemna, and Jesua, and Jessui, and Baria, and Sara their sister.
7	31	And the sons of Baria: Haber, and Melchiel: he is the father of Barsaith.
7	32	And Heber begot Jephlat, and Somer, and Hotham, and Suaa their sister.
7	33	The sons of Jephlat: Phosech, and Chamaal, and Asoth: these are the sons of Jephlat.
7	34	And the sons of Somer: Ahi, and Roaga and Haba, and Aram.
7	35	And the sons of Helem his brother: Supha, and Jemna, and Selles, and Amal.
7	36	The sons of Supha: Sue, Hernapher, and Sual, and Beri, and Jamra.
7	37	Bosor and Hod, and Samma, and Salusa, and Jethran, and Bera.
7	38	The sons of Jether: Jephone, and Phaspha, and Ara.
7	39	And the sons of Olla: Aree, and Haniel, and Resia.
7	40	All these were sons of Aser, heads of their families, choice and most valiant captains of captains: and the number of them that were of the age that was fit for war, was six and twenty thousand.
8	1	Now Benjamin begot Bale his firstborn, Asbel the second, Ahara the third,
8	2	Nohaa the fourth, and Rapha the fifth.
8	3	And the sons of Bale were Addar, and Gera, and Abiud,
8	4	And Abisue, and Naaman, and Ahoe,
8	5	And Gera, and Sephuphan, and Huram.
8	6	These are the sons of Abed, heads of families that dwelt in Gabaa, who were removed into Manahath.
8	7	And Naaman, and Achia, and Gera he removed them, and begot Oza, and Ahiud.
8	8	And Saharim begot in the land of Moab, after he sent away Husim and Bara his wives.
8	9	And he begot of Hodes his wife Jobab, and Sebia, and Mosa, and Molchom,
8	10	And Jehus and Sechia, and Marma. These were his sons heads of their families.
8	11	And Mehusim begot Abitob, and Elphaal.
8	12	And the sons of Elphaal were Heber, and Misaam, and Samad: who built Ono, and Lod, and its daughters.
8	13	And Baria, and Sama were heads of their kindreds that dwelt in Aialon: these drove away the inhabitants of Geth.
8	14	And Ahio, and Sesac, and Jerimoth,
8	15	And Zabadia, and Arod, and Heder,
8	16	And Michael, and Jespha, and Joha, the sons of Baria.
8	17	And Zabadia, and Mosollam, Hezeci, and Heber,
8	18	And Jesamari, and Jezlia, and Jobab, sons of Elphaal,
8	19	And Jacim, and Zechri, and Zabdi,
8	20	And Elioenai, and Selethai, and Elial,
8	21	And Adaia, and Baraia, and Samareth, the sons of Semei.
8	22	And Jespham, and Heber, and Eliel,
8	23	And Abdon, and Zechri, and Hanan,
8	24	And Hanania, and Elam, and Anathothia.
8	25	And Jephdaia, and Phanuel the sons of Sesac.
8	26	And Samsari, and Sohoria and Otholia,
8	27	And Jersia, and Elia, and Zechri, the sons of Jeroham.
8	28	These were the chief fathers, and heads of their families who dwelt in Jerusalem.
8	29	And at Gabaon dwelt Abigabaon, and the name of his wife was Maacha:
8	30	And his firstborn son Abdon, and Sur, and Cis, and Baal, and Nadab,
8	31	And Gedor, and Ahio, and Zacher, and Macelloth:
8	32	And Macelloth begot Samaa: and they dwelt over against their brethren in Jerusalem with their brethren.
8	33	And Ner begot Cis and Cis begot Saul. And Saul begot Jonathan and Melchisua, and Abinadab, and Esbaal.
8	34	And the son of Jonathan was Meribbaal: and Meribbaal begot Micha.
8	35	And the sons of Micha were Phithon, and Melech, and Tharaa, and Ahaz.
8	36	And Ahaz begot Joada: and Joada begot Alamath, and Azmoth, and Zamri: and Zamri begot Mosa,
8	37	And Mosa begot Banaa, whose son was Rapha, of whom was born Elasa, who begot Asel.
8	38	And Asel had six sons whose names were Ezricam, Bochru, Ismahel, Saris, Obdia, and Hanan. All these were the sons of Asel.
8	39	And the sons of Esec, his brother, were Ulam the firstborn, and Jehus the second, and Eliphalet the third.
8	40	And the sons of Ulam were most valiant men, and archers of great strength: and they had many sons and grandsons, even to a hundred and fifty. All these were children of Benjamin.
9	1	And all Israel was numbered: and the sum of them was written in the book of the kings of Israel, and Juda: and they were carried away to Babylon for their transgression.
9	2	Now the first that dwelt in their possessions, and in their cities, were the Israelites, and the priests, and the Levites, and the Nathineans.
9	3	And in Jerusalem dwelt of the children of Juda, and of the children of Benjamin, and of the children of Ephraim, and of Manasses.
9	4	Othei the son of Ammiud, the son of Amri, the son of Omrai, the son of Bonni of the sons of Phares the son of Juda.
9	5	And of Siloni: Asaia the firstborn, and his sons.
9	6	And of the sons of Zara: Jehuel and their brethren, six hundred and ninety.
9	7	And of the sons of Benjamin: Salo the son of Mosollam, the son of Oduia, the son of Asana:
9	8	And Jobania the son of Jeroham: and Ela the son of Ozi, the son of Mochori and Mosallam the son of Saphatias, the son of Rahuel, the son of Jebania:
9	9	And their brethren by their families, nine hundred and fifty-six. All these were heads of their families, by the houses of their fathers.
9	10	And of the priests: Jedaia, Joiarib, and Jachin:
9	11	And Azarias the son of Helcias, the son of Mosollam, the son of Sadoc, the son of Maraioth, the son of Achitob, high priest of the house of God.
9	12	And Adaias the son of Jeroham, the son of Phassur, the son of Melchias, and Maasai the son of Adiel, the son of Jezra, the son of Mosollam, the son of Mosollamith, the son of Emmer.
9	13	And their brethren heads in their families a thousand seven hundred and threescore, very strong and able men for the work of the ministry in the house of God.
9	14	And of the Levites: Semeia the son of Hassub the son of Ezricam, the son of Hasebia of the sons of Merari.
9	15	And Bacbacar the carpenter, and Galal, and Mathania the son of Micha, the son of Zechri the son of Asaph:
9	16	And Obdia the son of Semeia, the son of Galal, the son of Idithum: and Barachia the son of Asa, the son of Elcana, who dwelt in the suburbs of Netophati.
9	17	And the porters were Sellum, and Accub, and Telmon, and Ahiman: and their brother Sellum was the prince,
9	18	Until that time, in the king’s gate eastward, the sons of Levi waited by their turns.
9	19	But Sellum the son of Core, the son of Abiasaph, the son of Core, with his brethren and his father’s house, the Corites were over the works of the service, keepers of the gates of the tabernacle: and their families in turns were keepers of the entrance of the camp of the Lord.
9	20	And Phinees the son of Eleazar, was their prince before the Lord,
9	21	And Zacharias the son of Mosollamia, was porter of the gate of the tabernacle of the testimony:
9	22	All these that were chosen to be porters at the gates, were two hundred and twelve: the they were registered in their proper towns: whom David and Samuel the seer appointed in their trust.
9	23	As well them as their sons, to keep the gates of the house of the Lord, and the tabernacle by their turns.
9	24	In four quarters were the porters: that is to say, toward the east, and west, and north, and south.
9	25	And their brethren dwelt in village, and came upon their sabbath days from time to time.
9	26	To these four Levites were committed the whole number of the porters, and they were over the chambers, and treasures, of the house of the Lord.
9	27	And they abode in their watches round about the temple of the Lord: that when it was time, they might open the gates in the morning.
9	28	And some of their stock had the charge of the vessels for the ministry: for the vessels were both brought in and carried out by number.
9	29	Some of them also had the instruments of the sanctuary committed unto them, and the charge of the fine flour, and wine, and oil, and frankincense, and spices.
9	30	And the sons of the priests made the ointments of the spices.
9	31	And Mathathias a Levite, the firstborn of Sellum the Corite, was overseer of such things as were fried the fryingpan.
9	32	And some of the sons of Caath their brethren, were over the loaves of proposition, to prepare always new for every sabbath.
9	33	These are the chief of the singing men of the families of the Levites, who dwelt in the chambers, by the temple, that they might serve continually day and night in their ministry.
9	34	The heads of the Levites, princes in their families, abode in Jerusalem.
9	35	And in Gabaon dwelt Jehiel the father of Gabaon, and the name of his wife was Maacha:
9	36	His firstborn son Abdon, and Sur, and Cis, and Baal, and Ner, and Nadab,
9	37	Gedor also, and Ahio, and Zacharias, and Macelloth.
9	38	And Macelloth begot Samaan: these dwelt over against their brethren in Jerusalem, with their brethren.
9	39	Now Ner begot Cis: and Cis begot Saul: and Saul begot Jonathan and Melchisua, and Abinadab, and Esbaal.
9	40	And the son of Jonathan, was Meribbaal: and Meribbaal begot Micha.
9	41	And the sons of Micha, were Phithon, and Melech, and Tharaa, and Ahaz.
9	42	And Ahaz begot Jara, and Jara begot Alamath, and Azmoth, and Zamri. And Zamri begot Mosa.
9	43	And Mosa begot Banaa: whose son Raphaia begot Elasa: of whom was born Asel.
9	44	And Asel had six sons whose names are, Ezricam Bochru, Ismahel, Saria, Obdia, Hanan: these are the sons of Asel.
10	1	Now the Philistines fought against Israel, and the men of Israel fled from before the Philistines, and fell down wounded in mount Gelboe.
10	2	And the Philistines drew near pursuing after Saul, and his sons, and they killed Jonathan, and Abinadab, and Melchisua the sons of Saul.
10	3	And the battle grew hard against Saul and the archers reached him, and wounded him with arrows.
10	4	And Saul said to his armourbearer: Draw thy sword, and kill me: lest these uncircumcised come, and mock me. But his armourbearer would not, for he was struck with fear: so Saul took his sword, and fell upon it.
10	5	And when his armourbearer saw it, to wit, that Saul was dead, he also fell upon his sword and died.
10	6	So Saul died, and his three sons, and all his house fell together.
10	7	And when the men of Israel, that dwelt in the plains, saw this, they fled: and Saul and his sons being dead, they forsook their cities, and were scattered up and down: and the Philistines came, and dwelt in them.
10	8	And the next day the Philistines taking away the spoils of them that were slain, found Saul and his sons lying on mount Gelboe.
10	9	And when they had stripped him, and out off his head, and taken away his armour, they sent it into their land, to be carried about, and shewn in the temples of the idols and to the people.
10	10	And his armour they dedicated in the temple of their god, and his head they fastened up in the temple of Dagon.
10	11	And when the men of Jabes Galaad had heard this, to wit, all that the Philistines had done to Saul,
10	12	All the valiant men of them arose, and took the bodies of Saul and of his sons, and brought them to Jabes, and buried their bones under the oak that was in Jabes, and they fasted seven days.
10	13	So Saul died for his iniquities, because he transgressed the commandment of the Lord, which he had commanded, and kept it not: and moreover consulted also a witch,
10	14	And trusted not in the Lord: therefore he slew him, and transferred his kingdom to David the son of Isai.
11	1	Then all Israel gathered themselves to David in Hebron, saying: We are thy bone, and thy flesh.
11	2	Yesterday also, and the day before when Saul was king, thou wast he that leddest out and broughtest in Israel: for the Lord thy God said to thee: Thou shalt feed my people Israel, and thou shalt be ruler over them.
11	3	So all the ancients of Israel came to the king to Hebron, and David made a covenant with them before the Lord: and they anointed him king over Israel according to the word of the Lord which he spoke in the hand of Samuel.
11	4	And David and all Israel went to Jerusalem, which is Jebus, where the Jebusites were the inhabitants of the land.
11	5	And the inhabitants of Jebus said to David: Thou shalt not come in here. But David took the castle of Sion, which is the city of David.
11	6	And he said: Whosoever shall first strike the Jebusites, shall be the head and chief captain. And Joab the son of Sarvia went up first, and was made the general.
11	7	And David dwelt in the castle, and therefore it was called the city of David,
11	8	And he built the city round about from Mello all round, and Joab built the rest of the city.
11	9	And David went on growing and increasing, and the Lord of hosts was with him.
11	10	These are the chief of the valiant man of David, who helped him to be made king over all Israel, according to the word of the Lord, which he spoke to Israel.
11	11	And this is the number of the heroes of David: Jesbaam the son of Hachamoni the chief among the thirty: he lifted up his spear against three hundred wounded by him at one time.
11	12	And after him was Eleazar his uncle’s son the Ahohite, who was one of the three mighties.
11	13	He was with David in Phesdomim, when the Philistines were gathered to that place to battle: and the field of that country was full of barley, and the people fled from before the Philistines.
11	14	But these men stood in the midst of the field, and defended it: and they slew the Philistines, and the Lord gave a great deliverance to his people.
11	15	And three of the thirty captains went down to the rock, wherein David was, to the cave of Odollam, when the Philistines encamped in the valley of Raphaim.
11	16	And David was in a hold, and the garrison of the Philistines in Bethlehem.
11	17	And David longed, and said: O that some man would give me water of the cistern of Bethlehem, which is in the gate.
11	18	And these three broke through the midst of the camp of the Philistines, and drew water out of the cistern of Bethlehem, which was in the gate, and brought it to David to drink: and he would not drink of it, but rather offered it to the Lord,
11	19	Saying: God forbid that I should do this in the sight of my God, and should drink the blood of these men: for with the danger of their lives they have brought me the water. And therefore he would not drink. These things did the three most valiant.
11	20	And Abisai the brother of Joab, he was chief of three, and he lifted up his spear against three hundred whom he slew, and he was renowned among the three,
11	21	And illustrious among the second three, and their captain: but yet he attained not to the first three.
11	22	Banaias the son of Joiada a most valiant man, of Cabseel, who had done many acts: he slew the two ariels of Moab: and he went down, and killed a lion in the midst of a pit in the time of snow.
11	23	And he slew an Egyptian, whose stature was of five cubits, and who had a spear like a weaver’s beam: and he went down to him with a staff, and plucked away the spear, that he held in his hand, and slew him with his own spear.
11	24	These things did Banaias the son of Joiada, who was renowned among the three valiant ones,
11	25	And the first among the thirty, but yet to the three he attained not: and David made him of his council.
11	26	Moreover the most valiant men of the army, were Asahel brother of Joab, and Elchanan the son of his uncle of Bethlehem,
11	27	Sammoth an Arorite, Helles a Phalonite,
11	28	Ira the son of Acces a Thecuite, Abiezer an Anathothite,
11	29	Sobbochai a Husathite, Ilai an Ahohite,
11	30	Maharai a Netophathite, Heled the son of Baana a Netophathite,
11	31	Ethai the son of Ribai of Gabaath of the sons of Benjamin, Banai a Pharathonite,
11	32	Hurai of the torrent Gaas, Abiel an Arbathite, Azmoth a Bauramite, Eliaba a Salabonite,
11	33	The sons of Assem a Gezonite, Jonathan the son of Sage an Ararite,
11	34	Ahiam the son of Sachar an Ararite,
11	35	Eliphal the son of Ur,
11	36	Hepher a Mecherathite, Ahia a Phelonite,
11	37	Hesro a Carmelite, Naarai the son of Azbai,
11	38	Joel the brother of Nathan, Mibahar the son of Agarai.
11	39	Selec an Ammonite, Naharai a Berothite, the armourbearer of Joab the son of Sarvia.
11	40	Ira a Jethrite, Gareb a Jethrite,
11	41	Urias a Hethite, Zabad the son of Oholi,
11	42	Adina the son of Siza a Rubenite the prince of the Rubenites, and thirty with him:
11	43	Hanan the son of Maacha, and Josaphat a Mathanite,
11	44	Ozia an Astarothite, Samma, and Jehiel the sons of Hotham an Arorite,
11	45	Jedihel the son of Zamri, and Joha his brother a Thosaite,
11	46	Eliel a Mahumite, and Jeribai, and Josaia the sons of Elnaim, and Jethma a Moabite, Eliel, and Obed, and Jasiel of Masobia.
12	1	Now these are they that came to David to Siceleg, while he yet fled from Saul the son of Cis, and they were most valiant and excellent warriors,
12	2	Bending the bow, and using either hand in hurling stones with slings, and shooting arrows: of the brethren of Saul of Benjamin.
12	3	The chief was Ahiezer, and Joas, the sons of Samoa of Gabaath, and Jaziel, and Phallet the sons of Azmoth, and Beracha, and Jehu an Anathothite.
12	4	And Samaias of Gabaon, the stoutest amongst the thirty and over the thirty; Jeremias, and Jeheziel and Johanan, and Jozabad of Gaderoth;
12	5	And Eluzai, and Jerimuth, and Baalia, and Samaria, and Saphatia the Haruphite;
12	6	Elcana, and Jesia, and Azareel, and Joezer, and Jesbaam of Carehim:
12	7	And Joela, and Zabadia the sons of Jeroham of Gedor.
12	8	From Gaddi also there went over to David, when he lay hid in the wilderness most valiant men, and excellent warriors, holding shield and spear: whose faces were like the faces of a lion, and they were swift like the roebucks on the mountains.
12	9	Ezer the chief, Obdias the second, Eliab the third,
12	10	Masmana the fourth, Jeremias the fifth,
12	11	Ethi the sixth, Eliel the seventh,
12	12	Johanan the eighth, Elzebad the ninth,
12	13	Jerenias the tenth, Machbani the eleventh,
12	14	These were of the sons of Gad, captains of the army: the least of them was captain over a hundred soldiers, and the greatest over a thousand.
12	15	These are they who passed over the Jordan in the first month, when it is used to flow over its banks: and they put to flight all that dwelt in the valleys both toward the east and toward the west.
12	16	And there came also of the men of Benjamin, and of Juda to the hold, in which David abode.
12	17	And David went out to meet them, and said: If you are come peaceably to me to help me, let my heart be joined to you: but if you plot against me for my enemies whereas I have no iniquity in my hands, let the God of our fathers see, and judge.
12	18	But the spirit came upon Amasai the chief among thirty, and he said: We are thine, O David, and for thee, O son of Isai: peace, peace be to thee, and peace to thy helpers. For thy God helpeth thee. So David received them, and made them captains of the band.
12	19	And there were some of Manasses that went over to David, when he came with the Philistines against Saul to fight: but he did not fight with them: because the lords of the Philistines taking counsel sent him back, saying: With the danger of our heads he will return to his master Saul.
12	20	So when he went back to Siceleg, there fled to him of Manasses, Ednas and Jozabad, and Jedihel, and Michael, and Ednas, and Jozabad, and Eliu, and Salathi, captains of thousands in Manasses.
12	21	These helped David against the rovers: for they were all most valiant men, and were made commanders in the army.
12	22	Moreover day by day there came some to David to help him till they became a great number, like the army of God.
12	23	And this is the number of the chiefs of the army who came to David, when he was in Hebron, to transfer to him the kingdom of Saul, according to the word of the Lord.
12	24	The sons of Juda bearing shield and spear, six thousand eight hundred well appointed to war.
12	25	Of the sons of Simeon valiant men for war, seven thousand one hundred.
12	26	Of the sons of Levi, four thousand six hundred.
12	27	And Joiada prince of the race of Aaron, and with him three thousand seven hundred.
12	28	Sadoc also a young man of excellent disposition, and the house of his father, twenty-two principal men.
12	29	And of the sons of Benjamin the brethren of Saul, three thousand: for hitherto a great part of them followed the house of Saul.
12	30	And of the sons of Ephraim twenty thousand eight hundred, men of great valour renowned in their kindreds.
12	31	And of the half tribe of Manasses, eighteen thousand, every one by their names, came to make David king.
12	32	Also of the sons of Issachar men of understanding, that knew all times to order what Israel should do, two hundred principal men: and all the rest of the tribe followed their counsel.
12	33	And of Zabulon such as went forth to battle, and stood in array well appointed with armour for war, there came fifty thousand to his aid, with no double heart.
12	34	And of Nephtali, a thousand leaders: and with them seven and thirty thousand, furnished with shield and spear.
12	35	Of Dan also twenty-eight thousand six hundred prepared for battle.
12	36	And of Aser forty thousand going forth to fight, and challenging in battle.
12	37	And on the other side of the Jordan of the sons of Ruben, and of Gad, and of the half of the tribe of Manasses a hundred and twenty thousand, furnished with arms for war.
12	38	All these men of war well appointed to fight, came with a perfect heart to Hebron, to make David king over all Israel: and all the rest also of Israel, were of one heart to make David king.
12	39	And they were there with David three days eating and drinking: for their brethren had prepared for them.
12	40	Moreover they that were near them even as far as Issachar, and Zabulon, and Nephtali, brought loaves on asses, and on camels, and on mules, and on oxen, to eat: meal, figs, raisins, wine, oil, and oxen, and sheep in abundance, for there was joy in Israel.
13	1	David consulted with the captains of thousands, and of hundreds, and with all the commanders.
13	2	And he said to all the assembly of Israel: If it please you; and if the words which I speak come from the Lord our God, let us send to the rest of our brethren into all the countries of Israel, and to the priests, and the Levites, that dwell in the suburbs of the cities, to gather themselves to us,
13	3	And let us bring again the ark of our God to us: for we sought it not in the days of Saul.
13	4	And all the multitude answered that it should be so: for the word pleased all the people.
13	5	So David assembled all Israel from Sihor of Egypt, even to the entering into Emath, to bring the ark of God from Cariathiarim.
13	6	And David went up with all the men of Israel to the hill of Cariathiarim which is in Juda, to bring thence the ark of the Lord God sitting upon the cherubims, where his name is called upon.
13	7	And they carried the ark of God upon a new cart out of the house of Abinadab. And Oza and his brother drove the cart.
13	8	And David and all Israel played before God with all their might with hymns, and with harps, and with psalteries, and timbrels, and cymbals, and trumpets,
13	9	And when they came to the floor of Chidon, Oza put forth his hand, to hold up the ark: for the ox being wanton had made it lean a little on one side.
13	10	And the Lord was angry with Oza, and struck him, because he had touched the ark; and he died there before the Lord.
13	11	And David was troubled because the Lord had divided Oza: and he called that place the Breach of Oza to this day.
13	12	And he feared God at that time, saying: How can I bring in the ark of God to me?
13	13	And therefore he brought it not home to himself, that is, into the city of David, but carried it aside into the house of Obededom the Gethite.
13	14	And the ark of God remained in the house of Obededom three months: and the Lord blessed his house, and all that he had.
14	1	And Hiram king of Tyre sent messengers to David, and cedar trees, and masons, and carpenters, to build him a house.
14	2	And David perceived that the Lord had confirmed him king over Israel, and that his kingdom was exalted over his people Israel.
14	3	And David took other wives in Jerusalem: and he begot sons, and daughters.
14	4	Now these are the names of them that were born to him in Jerusalem: Samua, and Sobad, Nathan, and Solomon,
14	5	Jebahar, and Elisua, and Eliphalet,
14	6	And Noga, and Napheg, and Japhia,
14	7	Elisama, and Baaliada, and Eliphalet.
14	8	And the Philistines hearing that David was anointed king over all Israel, went all up to seek him: and David heard of it, and went out against them.
14	9	And the Philistines came and spread themselves in the vale of Raphaim.
14	10	And David consulted the Lord, saying: Shall I go up against the Philistines, and wilt thou deliver them into my hand? And the Lord said to him: Go up, and I will deliver them into thy hand.
14	11	And when they were come to Baalpharasim, David defeated them there, and he said: God hath divided my enemies by my hand, as waters are divided: and therefore the name of that place was called Baalpharasim.
14	12	And they left there their gods, and David commanded that they should be burnt.
14	13	Another time also the Philistines made an irruption, and spread themselves abroad in the valley.
14	14	And David consulted God again, and God said to him: Go not up after them, turn away from them, and come upon them over against the pear trees.
14	15	And when thou shalt hear the sound of one going in the tops of the pear trees, then shalt thou go out to battle. For God is gone out before thee to strike the army of the Philistines.
14	16	And David did as God had commanded him, and defeated the army of the Philistines, slaying them from Gabaon to Gazera.
14	17	And the name of David became famous in all countries, and the Lord made all nations fear aim.
15	1	He made also houses for himself in the city of David: and built a place for the ark of God, and pitched a tabernacle for it.
15	2	Then David said: No one ought to carry the ark of God, but the Levites, whom the Lord hath chosen to carry it, and to minister unto himself for ever.
15	3	And he gathered all Israel together into Jerusalem, that the ark of God might be brought into its place, which he had prepared for it.
15	4	And the sons of Aaron also, and the Levites.
15	5	Of the children of Caath, Uriel was the chief, and his brethren a hundred and twenty.
15	6	Of the sons of Merari, Asaia the chief, and his brethren two hundred and twenty.
15	7	Of the sons of Gersom, Joel the chief, and his brethren a hundred and thirty.
15	8	Of the sons of Elisaphan, Semeias the chief: and his brethren two hundred.
15	9	Of the sons of Hebron, Eliel the chief: and his brethren eighty.
15	10	Of the sons of Oziel, Aminadab the chief: and his brethren a hundred and twelve.
15	11	And David called Sadoc, and Abiathar the priests, and the Levites, Uriel, Asaia, Joel, Semeia, Eliel, and Aminadab:
15	12	And he said to them: You that are the heads of the Levitical families, be sanctified with your brethren, and bring the ark of the Lord the God of Israel to the place, which is prepared for it:
15	13	Lest as the Lord at first struck us, because you were not present, the same should now also come to pass, by our doing some thing against the law.
15	14	So the priests and the Levites were sanctified, to carry the ark of the Lord the God of Israel.
15	15	And the sons of Levi took the ark of God as Moses had commanded, according to the word of the Lord, upon their shoulders, with the staves.
15	16	And David spoke to the chiefs of the Levites, to appoint some of their brethren to be singers with musical instruments, to wit, on psalteries, and harps, and cymbals, that the joyful noise might resound on high.
15	17	And they appointed Levites, Hemam the son of Joel, and of his brethren Asaph the son of Barachias: and of the sons of Merari, their brethren: Ethan the son of Casaia.
15	18	And with them their brethren: in the second rank, Zacharias, and Ben, and Jaziel, and Semiramoth, and Jahiel, and Ani, and Eliab, and Banaias, and Maasias, and Mathathias, and Eliphalu, and Macenias, and Obededom, and Jehiel, the porters.
15	19	Now the singers, Heman, Asaph, and Ethan, sounded with cymbals of brass.
15	20	And Zacharias, and Oziel, and Semiramoth, and Jehiel, and Ani, and Eliab, and Maasias, and Banaias, sung mysteries upon psalteries.
15	21	And Mathathias, and Eliphalu, and Macenias and Obededom, and Jehiel and Ozaziu, sung a song of victory for the octave upon harps.
15	22	And Chonenias chief of the Levites, presided over the prophecy, to give out the tunes: for he was very skilful.
15	23	And Barachias, and Elcana, were doorkeepers of the ark.
15	24	And Sebenias, and Josaphat, and Nathanael, and Amasai, and Zacharias, and Banaias, and Eliezer the priests, sounded with trumpets, before the ark of God: and Obededom and Jehias were porters of the ark.
15	25	So David and all the ancients of Israel, and the captains over thousands, went to bring the ark of the covenant of the Lord out of the house of Obededom with joy.
15	26	And when God had helped the Levites who carried the ark of the covenant of the Lord, they offered in sacrifice seven oxen, and seven rams.
15	27	And David was clothed with a robe of fine linen, and all the Levites that carried the ark, and the singing men, and Chonenias the ruler of the prophecy among the singers: and David also had on him an ephod of linen.
15	28	And all Israel brought the ark of the covenant of the Lord with joyful shouting, and sounding with the sound of the cornet, and with trumpets, and cymbals, and psalteries, and harps.
15	29	And when the ark of the covenant of the Lord was come to the city of David, Michol the daughter of Saul looking out at a window, saw king David dancing and playing, and she despised him in her heart.
16	1	So they brought the ark of God, and set it in the midst of the tent, which David had pitched for it: and they offered holocausts, and peace offerings before God.
16	2	And when David had made an end of offering holocausts, and peace offerings, he blessed the people in the name of the Lord.
16	3	And he divided to all and every one, both men and women, a loaf of bread, and a piece of roasted beef, and flour fried with oil.
16	4	And he appointed Levites to minister before the ark of the Lord, and to remember his works, and to glorify, and praise the Lord God of Israel.
16	5	Asaph the chief, and next after him Zacharias: moreover Jahiel, and Semiramoth, and Jehiel, and Mathathias, and Eliab, and Banaias, and Obededom: and Jehiel over the instruments of psaltery, and harps: and Asaph sounded with cymbals:
16	6	But Banaias, and Jaziel the priests, to sound the trumpet continually before the ark of the covenant of the Lord.
16	7	In that day David made Asaph the chief to give praise to the Lord with his brethren.
16	8	Praise ye the Lord, and call upon his name: make known his doings among the nations.
16	9	Sing to him, yea, sing praises to him: and relate all his wondrous works.
16	10	Praise ye his holy name: let the heart of them rejoice, that seek the Lord.
16	11	Seek ye the Lord, and his power: seek ye his face evermore.
16	12	Remember his wonderful works, which he hath done: his signs, and the judgments of his mouth.
16	13	O ye seed of Israel his servants, ye children of Jacob his chosen.
16	14	He is the Lord our God: his judgments are in all the earth.
16	15	Remember for ever his covenant: the word, which he commanded to a thousand generations.
16	16	The covenant which he made with Abraham: and his oath to Isaac.
16	17	And he appointed the same to Jacob for a precept: and to Israel for an everlasting covenant:
16	18	Saying: To thee will I give the land of Chanaan: the lot of your inheritance.
16	19	When they were but a small number: very few and sojourners in it.
16	20	And they passed from nation to nation: and from a kingdom to another people.
16	21	He suffered no man to do them wrong: and reproved kings for their sake.
16	22	Touch not my anointed: and do no evil to my prophets.
16	23	Sing ye to the Lord, all the earth: shew forth from day to day his salvation.
16	24	Declare his glory among the Gentiles: his wonders among all people.
16	25	For the Lord is great and exceedingly to be praised: and he is to be feared above all gods.
16	26	For all the gods of the nations are idols: but the Lord made the heavens.
16	27	Praise and magnificence are before him: strength and joy in his place.
16	28	Bring ye to the Lord, O ye families of the nations: bring ye to the Lord glory and empire.
16	29	Give to the Lord glory to his name, bring up sacrifice, and come ye in his sight: and adore the Lord in holy becomingness.
16	30	Let all the earth be moved at his presence: for he hath founded the world immoveable.
16	31	Let the heavens rejoice, and the earth be glad: and let them say among the nations: The Lord hath reigned.
16	32	Let the sea roar, and the fulness thereof: let the fields rejoice, and all things that are in them.
16	33	Then shall the trees of the wood give praise before the Lord: because he is come to judge the earth.
16	34	Give ye glory to the Lord, for he is good: for his mercy endureth for ever.
16	35	And say ye: Save us, O God our savior: and gather us together, and deliver us from the nations, that we may give glory to thy holy name, and may rejoice in singing thy praises.
16	36	Blessed be the Lord the God of Israel from eternity to eternity: and let all the people say Amen, and a hymn to God.
16	37	So he left there before the ark of the covenant of the Lord, Asaph and his brethren to minister in the presence of the ark continually day by day, and in their courses.
16	38	And Obededom, with his brethren sixty-eight: and Obededom the son of Idithun, and Hosa he appointed to be porters.
16	39	And Sadoc the priest, and his brethren priests, before the tabernacle of the Lord in the high place, which was in Gabaon.
16	40	That they should offer holocausts to the Lord upon the altar of holocausts continually, morning and evening, according to all that is written in the law of the Lord, which he commanded Israel.
16	41	And after him Heman, and Idithun, and the rest that were chosen, every one by his name to give praise to the Lord: because his mercy endureth for ever.
16	42	And Heman and Idithun sounded the trumpet, and played on the cymbals, and all kinds of musical instruments to sing praises to God: and the sons of Idithun he made porters.
16	43	And all the people returned to their houses: and David to bless also his own house.
17	1	Now when David was dwelling in his house, he said to Nathan the prophet: Behold I dwell in a house of cedar: and the ark of the covenant of the Lord is under skins.
17	2	And Nathan said to David: Do all that is in thy heart: for God is with thee.
17	3	Now that night the word of God came to Nathan, saying:
17	4	Go, and speak to David my servant: Thus saith the Lord: Thou shalt not build me a house to dwell in.
17	5	For I have not remained in a house from the time that I brought up Israel, to this day: but I have been always changing places in a tabernacle, and in a tent,
17	6	Abiding with all Israel. Did I ever speak to any one, of all the judges of Israel whom I charged to feed my people, saying: Why have you not built me a house of cedar?
17	7	Now therefore thus shalt thou say to my servant David: Thus saith the Lord of hosts: I took thee from the pastures, from following the flock, that thou shouldst be ruler of my people Israel.
17	8	And I have been with thee whithersoever thou hast gone: and have slain all thy enemies before thee, and have made thee a name like that of one of the great ones that are renowned in the earth.
17	9	And I have given a place my people Israel: they shall be planted, and shall dwell therein, and shall be moved no more, neither shall the children of iniquity waste them, as at the beginning,
17	10	Since the days that I gave judges to my people Israel, and have humbled all thy enemies. And I declare to thee, that the Lord will build thee a house.
17	11	And when thou shalt have ended thy days to go to thy fathers, I will raise up thy seed after thee, which shall be of thy sons: and I will establish his kingdom.
17	12	He shall build me a house, and I will establish his throne for ever.
17	13	I will be to him a father, and he shall be to me a son: and I will not take my mercy away from him, as I took it from him that was before thee.
17	14	But I will settle him in my house, and in my kingdom for ever: and his throne shall be most firm for ever.
17	15	According to all these words, and according to all this vision, so did Nathan speak to David.
17	16	And king David came and sat before the Lord, and said: Who am I, O Lord God, and what is my house, that thou shouldst give such things to me?
17	17	But even this hath seemed little in thy sight, and therefore thou hast also spoken concerning the house of thy servant for the time to come: and hast made me remarkable above all men, O Lord God.
17	18	What can David add more, seeing thou hast thus glorified thy servant, and known him?
17	19	O Lord, for thy servant’s sake, according to thy own heart, thou hast shewn all this magnificence, and wouldst have all the great things to be known.
17	20	O Lord there is none like thee: and here is no other God beside thee, of all whom we have heard of with our ears.
17	21	For what other nation is there upon earth like thy people Israel, whom God went to deliver, and make a people for himself, and by his greatness and terrors cast out nations before their face whom he had delivered out of Egypt?
17	22	And thou hast made thy people Israel to be thy own people for ever, and thou, O Lord, art become their God.
17	23	Now therefore, O Lord, let the word which thou hast spoken to thy servant, and concerning his house, be established for ever, and do as thou hast said.
17	24	And let thy name remain and be magnified for ever: and let it be said: The Lord of hosts is God of Israel, and the house of David his servant remaineth before him.
17	25	For thou, O Lord my God, hast revealed to the ear of thy servant, that thou wilt build him a house: and therefore thy servant hath found confidence to pray before thee.
17	26	And now O Lord, thou art God: and thou hast promised to thy servant such great benefits.
17	27	And thou hast begun to bless the house of thy servant, that it may be always before thee: for seeing thou blessest it, O Lord, it shall be blessed for ever.
18	1	And it came to pass after this, that David defeated the Philistines, and humbled them, and took away Geth, and her daughters out of the hands of the Philistines,
18	2	And he defeated Moab, and the Moabites were made David’s servants, and brought him gifts.
18	3	At that time David defeated also Adarezer king of Soba of the land of Hemath, when he went to extend his dominions as far as the river Euphrates.
18	4	And David took from him a thousand chariots, and seven thousand horsemen, and twenty thousand footmen, and he houghed all the chariot horses, only a hundred chariots, which he reserved for himself.
18	5	And the Syrians of Damascus came also to help Adarezer king of Soba: and David slew of them likewise two and twenty thousand men.
18	6	And he put a garrison in Damascus, that Syria also should serve him, and bring gifts. And the Lord assisted him in all things to which he went.
18	7	And David took the golden quivers which the servants of Adarezer had, and he brought them to Jerusalem.
18	8	Likewise out of Thebath and Chun, cities of Adarezer, he brought very much brass, of which Solomon made the brazen sea, and the pillars, and the vessels of brass.
18	9	Now when Thou king of Hemath heard that David had defeated all the army of Adarezer king of Soba,
18	10	He sent Adoram his son to king David to desire peace of him, and to congratulate him that he had defeated and overthrown Adarezer: for Thou was an enemy to Adarezer.
18	11	And all the vessels of gold, and silver and brass king David consecrated to the Lord, with the silver and gold which he had taken from all the nations, as well from Edom, and from Moab, and from the sons of Ammon, as from the Philistines, and from Amalec.
18	12	And Abisai the son of Sarvia slew of the Edomites in the vale of the saltpits, eighteen thousand:
18	13	And he put a garrison in Edom, that Edom should serve David: and the Lord preserved David in all things to which he went.
18	14	So David reigned over all Israel, and executed judgment and justice among all his people.
18	15	And Joab the son of Sarvia was over the army, and Josaphat the son of Ahilud recorder.
18	16	And Sadoc the son of Achitob, and Achimelech the son of Abiathar, were the priests: and Susa, scribe.
18	17	And Banaias the son of Joiada was over the bands of the Cerethi, and the Phelethi: and the sons of David were chief about the king.
19	1	Now it came to pass that Naas the king of the children of Ammon died, and his son reigned in his stead.
19	2	And David said: I will shew kindness to Hanon the son of Naas: for his father did a favour tome. And David sent messengers to comfort him upon the death of his father. But when they were come into the land of the children of Ammon, to comfort Hanon,
19	3	The princes of the children of Ammon said to Hanon: Thou thinkest perhaps that David to do honour to thy father hath sent comforters to thee: and thou dost not take notice, that his servants are come to thee to consider, and search, and spy out thy land.
19	4	Wherefore Hanon shaved the heads and beards of the servants of David, and cut away their garments from the buttocks to the feet, and sent them away.
19	5	And when they were gone, they sent word to David, who sent to meet them (for they had suffered a great affront) and ordered them to stay at Jericho till their beards grew and then to return.
19	6	And when the children of Ammon saw that they had done an injury to David, Hanon and the rest of the people sent a thousand talents of silver, to hire them chariots and horsemen out of Mesopotamia and out of Syria Maacha, and out of Soba.
19	7	And they hired two and thirty thousand chariots, and the king of Maacha, with his people. And they came and camped over against Medaba. And the children of Ammon gathered themselves together out of their cities, and came to battle.
19	8	And when David heard of it, he sent Joab, and all the army of valiant men:
19	9	And the children of Ammon came out and put their army in array before the gate of the city: and the kings, that were come to their aid, stood apart in the field.
19	10	Wherefore Joab understanding that the battle was set against him before and behind, chose out the bravest men of all Israel, and marched against the Syrians,
19	11	And the rest of the people he delivered into the hand of Abisai his brother, and they went against the children of Ammon.
19	12	And he said: If the Syrians be too strong for me, then thou shalt help me: but if the children of Ammon be too strong for thee, I will help thee.
19	13	Be of good courage and let us behave ourselves manfully for our people, and for the cities of our God: and the Lord will do that which is good in his sight.
19	14	So Joab and the people that were with him, went against the Syrians to the battle: and he put them to flight.
19	15	And the children of Ammon seeing that the Syrians were fled, they likewise fled from Abisai his brother, and went into the city: and Joab also returned to Jerusalem.
19	16	But the Syrians seeing that they had fallen before Israel, sent messengers, and brought to them the Syrians that were beyond the river: and Sophach, general of the army of Adarezer, was their leader.
19	17	And it was told David, and he gathered together all Israel, and passed the Jordan, and came upon them, and put his army in array against them, and they fought with him.
19	18	But the Syrian fled before Israel: and David slew of the Syrians seven thousand chariots, and forty thousand footmen, and Sophach the general of the army.
19	19	And when the servants of Adarezer saw themselves overcome by Israel, they went over to David, and served him: and Syria would not help the children of Ammon any more.
20	1	And it came to pass after the course of a year, at the time that kings go out to battle, Joab gathered together an army and the strength of the troops, and wasted the land of the children of Ammon: and went and besieged Rabba. But David stayed at Jerusalem, when Joab smote Rabba, and destroyed it.
20	2	And David took the crown of Melchom from his head, and found in it a talent weight of gold, and most precious stones, and he made himself a diadem of it: he took also the spoils of the city which were very great.
20	3	And the people that were therein he brought out: and made harrows, and sleds, and chariots of iron to go over them, so that they were cut and bruised to pieces: in this manner David dealt with all the cities of the children of Ammon: and he returned with all his people to Jerusalem.
20	4	After this there arose a war at Gazer against the Philistines: in which Sabachai the Husathite slew Saphai of the race of Raphaim, and humbled them.
20	5	Another battle also was fought against the Philistines, in which Adeodatus the son of Saltus a Bethlehemite slew the brother of Goliath the Gethite, the staff of whose spear was like a weaver’s beam.
20	6	There was another battle also in Geth, in which there was a man of great stature, whose fingers and toes were four and twenty, six on each hand and foot: who also was born of the stock of Rapha.
20	7	He reviled Israel: but Jonathan the son of Samaa the brother of David slew him. These were the sons of Rapha in Geth, who fell by the hand of David and his servants.
21	1	And Satan rose up against Israel: and moved David to number Israel.
21	2	And David said to Joab, and to the rulers of the people: Go, and number Israel from Bersabee even to Dan, and bring me the number of them that I may know it.
21	3	And Joab answered: The Lord make his people a hundred times more than they are: but, my lord the king, are they not all thy servants: why doth my lord seek this thing, which may be imputed as a sin to Israel?
21	4	But the king’s word rather prevailed: and Joab departed, and went through all Israel: and returned to Jerusalem.
21	5	And he gave David the number of them, whom he had surveyed: and all the number of Israel was found to be eleven hundred thousand men that drew the sword: and of Juda four hundred and seventy thousand fighting men.
21	6	But Levi and Benjamin he did not number: for Joab unwillingly executed the king’s orders.
21	7	And God was displeased with this thing that was commanded: and he struck Israel.
21	8	And David said to God: I have sinned exceedingly in doing this: I beseech thee take away the iniquity of thy servant, for I have done foolishly.
21	9	And the Lord spoke to Gad the seer of David, saying:
21	10	Go, and speak to David, and tell him: Thus saith the Lord: I give thee the choice of three things: choose one which thou wilt, and I will do it to thee.
21	11	And when Gad was come to David, he said to him: Thus saith the Lord: choose which thou wilt:
21	12	Either three years famine: or three months to flee from thy enemies, and not to be able to escape their sword: or three days to have the sword of the Lord, and pestilence in the land, and the angel of the Lord destroying in all the coasts of Israel: now therefore see what I shall answer him who sent me.
21	13	And David said to Gad: I am on every side in a great strait: but it is better for me to fall into the hands of the Lord, for his mercies are many, than into the hands of men.
21	14	So the Lord sent a pestilence upon Israel. And there fell of Israel seventy thousand men.
21	15	And he sent an angel to Jerusalem, to strike it: and as he was striking it, the Lord beheld, and took pity for the greatness of the evil: and said to the angel that destroyed: It is enough, now stop thy hand. And the angel of the Lord stood by the thrashingfloor of Ornan the Jebusite.
21	16	And David lifting up his eyes, saw the angel of the Lord standing between heaven and earth, with a drawn sword in his hand, turned against Jerusalem: and both he and the ancients clothed in haircloth, fell down flat on the ground.
21	17	And David said to God: Am not I he that commanded the people to be numbered? It is I that have sinned: it is I that have done the evil: but as for this flock, what hath it deserved? O Lord my God, let thy hand be turned, I beseech thee, upon me, and upon my father’s house: and let not thy people be destroyed.
21	18	And the angel of the Lord commanded Gad to tell David, to go up, and build an altar to the Lord God in the thrashingfloor of Ornan the Jebusite.
21	19	And David went up, according to the word of Gad, which he spoke to him in the name of the Lord.
21	20	Now when Ornan looked up, and saw the angel, he and his four sons hid themselves: for at that time he was thrashing wheat in the floor.
21	21	And as David was coming to Ornan, Ornan saw him, and went out of the thrashingfloor to meet him, and bowed down to him with his face to the ground.
21	22	And David said to him: Give me this place of thy thrashingfloor, that I may build therein an altar to the Lord: but thou shalt take of me as much money as it is worth, that the plague may cease from the people.
21	23	And Ornan said to David: Take it, and let my lord the king do all that pleaseth him: and moreover the oxen also I give for a holocaust, and the drays for wood, and the wheat for the sacrifice: I will give it all willingly.
21	24	And king David said to him: It shall not be so, but I will give thee money as much as it is worth: for I must not take it from thee, and so offer to the Lord holocausts free cost.
21	25	So David gave to Ornan for the place, six hundred sicles of gold of just weight.
21	26	And he built there an altar to the Lord: and he offered holocausts, and peace offerings, and he called upon the Lord, and he heard him by sending fire from heaven upon the altar of the holocaust.
21	27	And the Lord commanded the angel: and he put up his sword again into the sheath.
21	28	And David seeing that the Lord had heard him in the thrashingfloor of Ornan the Jebusite, forthwith offered victims there.
21	29	But the tabernacle of the Lord, which Moses made in the desert, and the altar of holocausts, was at that time in the high place of Gabaon.
21	30	And David could not go to the altar there to pray to God: for he was seized with an exceeding great fear, seeing the sword of the angel of the Lord.
22	1	Then David said: This is the house of God, And this is the altar for the holocaust of Israel.
22	2	And he commanded to gather together all the proselytes of the land of Israel, and out of them he appointed stonecutters to hew stones and polish them, to build the house of God.
22	3	And David prepared in abundance iron for the nails of the gates, and for the closures and joinings: and of brass an immense weight.
22	4	And the cedar trees were without number, which the Sidonians, and Tyrians brought to David.
22	5	And David said: Solomon my son is very young and tender, and the house which I would have to be built to the Lord, must be such as to be renowned in all countries: therefore I will prepare him necessaries. And therefore before his death he prepared all the charges.
22	6	And he called for Solomon his son: and commanded him to build a house to the Lord the God of Israel.
22	7	And David said to Solomon: My son, it was my desire to have built a house to the name of the Lord my God.
22	8	But the word of the Lord came to me, saying: Thou hast shed much blood, and fought many battles, so thou cannot not build house to my name, after shedding so much blood before me:
22	9	The son, that shall be born to thee, shall be a most quiet man: for I will make him rest from all his enemies round about: and therefore he shall be called Peaceable: and I will give peace and quietness to Israel all his days.
22	10	He shall build a house to my name, and he shall be a son to me, and I will be a father to him: and I will establish the throne of his kingdom over Israel for ever.
22	11	Now then, my son, the Lord be with thee, and do thou prosper, and build the house to the Lord thy God, as he hath spoken of thee.
22	12	The Lord also give thee wisdom and understanding, that thou mayest be able to rule Israel, and to keep the law of the Lord thy God.
22	13	For then thou shalt be able to prosper, if thou keep the commandments, and judgments, which the Lord commanded Moses to teach Israel: take courage and act manfully, fear not, nor be dismayed.
22	14	Behold I in my poverty have prepared the charges of the house of the Lord, of gold a hundred thousand talents, and of silver a million of talents: but of brass, and of iron there is no weight, for the abundance surpasseth all account: timber also and stones I have prepared for all the charges.
22	15	Thou hast also workmen in abundance, hewers of stones, and masons, and carpenters, and of all trades the most skilful in their work,
22	16	In gold, and in silver, and in brass, and in iron, whereof there is no number. Arise then, and be doing, and the Lord will be with thee.
22	17	David also charged all the princes of Israel, to help Solomon his son,
22	18	Saying: You see, that the Lord your God is with you, and hath given you rest round about, and hath delivered all your enemies into your hands, and the land is subdued before the Lord, and before his people.
22	19	Give therefore your hearts and your souls, to seek the Lord your God and arise, and build a sanctuary to the Lord God, that the ark of the covenant of the Lord, and the vessels consecrated to the Lord, may be brought into the house, which is built to the name of the Lord.
23	1	David being old and full of days, made Solomon his son king over Israel.
23	2	And he gathered together all the princes of Israel, and the priests and Levites.
23	3	And the Levites were numbered from the age of thirty years, and upwards: and there were found of them thirty-eight thousand men.
23	4	Of these twenty-four thousand were chosen, and distributed unto the ministry of the house of the Lord: and six thousand were the overseers and judges.
23	5	Moreover four thousand were porters: and as many singers singing to the Lord with the instruments, which he had made to sing with.
23	6	And David distributed them into courses by the families of the sons of Levi, to wit, of Gerson, and of Caath, and of Merari.
23	7	The sons of Gerson were Leedan and Semei.
23	8	The sons of Leedan: the chief Jahiel, and Zethan, and Joel, three.
23	9	The sons of Semei: Salomith, and Hosiel, and Aran, three: these were the heads of the families of Leedan.
23	10	And the sons of Semei were Leheth, and Ziza, and Jaus, and Baria: these were the sons of Semei, four.
23	11	And Leheth was the first, Ziza the second: but Jaus and Baria had not many children, and therefore they were counted in one family, and in one house.
23	12	The sons of Caath were Amram, and Isaar, Hebron, and Oziel, four.
23	13	The sons of Amram, Aaron, and Moses. And Aaron was separated to minister in the holy of holies, he and his sons for ever, and to burn incense before the Lord, according to his ceremonies, and to bless his name for ever.
23	14	The sons also of Moses, the man of God, were numbered in the tribe of Levi.
23	15	The sons of Moses were Gersom and Eliezer:
23	16	The sons of Gersom: Subuel the first.
23	17	And the sons of Eliezer were: Rohobia the first: and Eliezer had no more sons. But the sons of Rohobia were multiplied exceedingly.
23	18	The sons of Isaar: Salomith the first.
23	19	The sons of Hebron: Jeriau the first, Amarias the second, Jahaziel the third, Jecmaam the fourth.
23	20	The sons of Oziel: Micha the first, Jesia the second.
23	21	The sons of Merari: Moholi, and Musi. The sons of Moholi: Eleazar and Cis.
23	22	And Eleazar died, and had no sons but daughters: and the sons of Cis their brethren took them.
23	23	The sons of Musi: Moholi, and Eder, and Jerimoth, three.
23	24	These are the sons of Levi in their kindreds and families, princes by their courses, and the number of every head that did the works of the ministry of the house of the Lord from twenty years old and upward.
23	25	For David said: The Lord the God of Israel hath given rest to his people, and a habitation in Jerusalem for ever.
23	26	And it shall not be the office of the Levites to carry any more the tabernacle, and all the vessels for the service thereof.
23	27	So according to the last precepts of David, the sons of Levi are to be numbered from twenty years old and upward.
23	28	And they are to be under the hand of the sons of Aaron for the service of the house of the Lord, in the porches, and in the chambers, and in the place of purification, and in the sanctuary, and in all the works of the ministry of the temple of the Lord.
23	29	And the priests have the charge of the loaves of proposition, and of the sacrifice of fine flour, and of the unleavened cakes, and of the fryingpan, and of the roasting, and of every weight and measure.
23	30	And the Levites are to stand in the morning to give thanks, and to sing praises to the Lord: and in like manner in the evening,
23	31	As well in the oblation of the holocausts of the Lord, as in the sabbaths and in the new moons, and the rest of the solemnities, according to the number and ceremonies prescribed for every thing, continually before the Lord.
23	32	And let them keep the observances of the tabernacle of the covenant, and the ceremonies of the sanctuary, and the charge of the sons of Aaron their brethren, that they may minister in the house of the Lord.
24	1	Now these were the divisions of the sons of Aaron: The sons of Aaron: Nadab, and Abiu, and Eleazar, and Ithamar.
24	2	But Nadab and Abiu died before their father, and had no children: so Eleazar, and Ithamar did the office of the priesthood.
24	3	And David distributed them, that is, Sadoc of the sons of Eleazar, and Ahimelech of the sons of Ithamar, according to their courses and ministry.
24	4	And there were found many more of the sons of Eleazar among the principal men, than of the sons of Ithamar. And he divided them so, that there were of the sons of Eleazar, sixteen chief men by their families: and of the sons of Ithamar eight by their families and houses.
24	5	And he divided both the families one with the other by lot: for there were princes of the sanctuary, and princes of God, both of the sons of Eleazar, and of the sons of Ithamar.
24	6	And Semeias the son of Nathanael the scribe a Levite, wrote them down before the king and the princes, and Sadoc the priest, and Ahimelech the son of Abiathar, and the princes also of the priestly and Levitical families: one house, which was over the rest, of Eleazar: and another house, which had the rest under it, of Ithamar.
24	7	Now the first lot came forth to Joiarib, the second to Jedei,
24	8	The third to Harim, the fourth to Seorim,
24	9	The fifth to Melchia, the sixth to Maiman,
24	10	The seventh to Accos, the eighth to Abia,
24	11	The ninth to Jesua, the tenth to Sechenia,
24	12	The eleventh to Eliasib, the twelfth to Jacim,
24	13	The thirteenth to Hoppha, the fourteenth to Isbaab,
24	14	The fifteenth to Belga, the sixteenth to Emmer,
24	15	The seventeenth to Hezir, the eighteenth to Aphses,
24	16	The nineteenth to Pheteia, the twentieth to Hezechiel,
24	17	The one and twentieth to Jachin, the two and twentieth to Gamul,
24	18	The three and twentieth to Dalaiau, the four and twentieth to Maaziau.
24	19	These are their courses according to their ministries, to come into the house of the Lord, and according to their manner under the hand of Aaron their father: as the Lord the God of Israel had commanded.
24	20	Now of the rest of the sons of Levi, there was of the sons of Amram, Subael: and of the sons of Subael, Jehedeia.
24	21	Also of the sons of Rohobia the chief Jesias.
24	22	And the son of Isaar Salemoth, and the son of Salemoth Jahath:
24	23	And his son Jeriau the first, Amarias the second, Jahaziel the third, Jecmaan the fourth.
24	24	The son of Oziel, Micha: the son of Micha, Samir.
24	25	The brother of Micha, Jesia: and the son of Jesia, Zacharias.
24	26	The sons of Merari: Moholi and Musi: the son of Oziau: Benno.
24	27	The son also of Merari Oziau, and Soam, and Zacchur, and Hebri.
24	28	And the son of Moholi: Eleazar, who had no sons.
24	29	And the son of Cis, Jeramael.
24	30	The sons of Musi: Moholi, Eder, and Jerimoth. These are the sons of Levi according to the houses of their families.
24	31	And they also cast lots over against their brethren the sons of Aaron before David the king, and Sadoc, and Ahimelech, and the princes of the priestly and Levitical families, both the elder and the younger. The lot divided all equally.
25	1	Moreover David and the chief officers of the army separated for the ministry the sons of Asaph, and of Heman, and of Idithun: to prophesy with harps, and with psalteries, and with cymbals according to their number serving in their appointed office.
25	2	Of the sons of Asaph: Zacchur, and Joseph, and Nathania, and Asarela, sons of Asaph: under the hand of Asaph prophesying near the king.
25	3	And of Idithun: the sons of Idithun, Godolias, Sori, Jeseias, and Hasabias, and Mathathias, under the hand of their father Idithun, who prophesied with a harp to give thanks and to praise the Lord.
25	4	Of Heman also: the sons of Heman, Bocciau, Mathaniau, Oziel, Subuel, and Jerimoth, Hananias, Hanani, Eliatha, Geddelthi, and Romemthiezer, and Jesbacassa, Mellothi, Othir, Mahazioth:
25	5	All these were the sons of Heman the seer of the king in the words of God, to lift up the horn: and God gave to Heman fourteen sons and three daughters.
25	6	All these under their father’s hand were distributed to sing in the temple of the Lord, with cymbals, and psalteries and harps, for the service of the house of the Lord near the king: to wit, Asaph, and Idithun, and Heman.
25	7	And the number of them with their brethren, that taught the song of the Lord, all the teachers, were two hundred and eighty-eight.
25	8	And they cast lots by their courses, the elder equally with the younger, the learned and the unlearned together.
25	9	And the first lot came forth to Joseph, who was of Asaph. The second to Godolias, to him and his sons, and his brethren twelve.
25	10	The third to Zachur, to his sons and his brethren twelve.
25	11	The fourth to Isari, to his sons and his brethren twelve.
25	12	The fifth to Nathania, to his sons and his brethren twelve.
25	13	The sixth to Bocciau, to his sons and his brethren twelve.
25	14	The seventh to Isreela, to his sons and his brethren twelve.
25	15	The eighth to Jesaia, to his sons and his brethren twelve.
25	16	The ninth to Mathanaias, to his sons and his brethren twelve.
25	17	The tenth to Semeias, to his sons and his brethren twelve.
25	18	The eleventh to Azareel, to his sons and his brethren twelve.
25	19	The twelfth to Hasabia, to his sons and his brethren twelve.
25	20	The thirteenth to Subael, to his sons and his brethren twelve.
25	21	The fourteenth to Mathathias, to his sons and his brethren twelve.
25	22	The fifteenth to Jerimoth, to his sons and his brethren twelve.
25	23	The sixteenth to Hananias, to his sons and his brethren twelve.
25	24	The seventeenth to Jesbacassa, to his sons and his brethren twelve.
25	25	The eighteenth to Hanani, to his sons and his brethren twelve.
25	26	The nineteenth to Mellothi, to his sons and his brethren twelve.
25	27	The twentieth to Eliatha, to his sons and his brethren twelve.
25	28	The one and twentieth to Othir, to his sons and his brethren twelve.
25	29	The two and twentieth to Geddelthi, to his sons and his brethren twelve.
25	30	The three and twentieth to Mahazioth, to his sons and his brethren twelve.
25	31	The four and twentieth to Romemthiezer, to his sons and his brethren twelve.
26	1	And the divisions of the porters: of the Corites Meselemia, the son of Core, of the sons of Asaph.
26	2	The sons of Meselemia: Zacharias the firstborn, Jadihel the second, Zabadias the third, Jathanael the fourth,
26	3	Elam the fifth, Johanan the sixth, Elioenai the seventh.
26	4	And the sons of Obededom, Semeias the firstborn, Jozabad the second, Joaha the third, Sachar the fourth, Nathanael the fifth,
26	5	Ammiel the sixth, Issachar the seventh, Phollathi the eighth: for the Lord had blessed him.
26	6	And to Semei his son were born sons, heads of their families: for they were men of great valour.
26	7	The sons then of Semeias were Othni, and Raphael, and Obed, Elizabad, and his brethren most valiant men: and Eliu, and Samachias.
26	8	All these of the sons of Obededom: they, and their sons, and their brethren most able men for service, sixty-two of Obededom.
26	9	And the sons of Meselemia, and their brethren strong men, were eighteen.
26	10	And of Hosa, that is, of the sons of Merari: Semri the chief, (for he had not a firstborn, and therefore his father made him chief.)
26	11	Helcias the second, Tabelias the third, Zacharias the fourth: all these the sons, and the brethren of Hosa, were thirteen.
26	12	Among these were the divisions of the porters, so that the chiefs of the wards, as well as their brethren, always ministered in the house of the Lord.
26	13	And they cast lots equally, both little and great, by their families for every one of the gates.
26	14	And the lot of the east fell to Selemias. But to his son Zacharias, a very wise and learned man, the north gate fell by lot.
26	15	And to Obededom and his sons that towards the south: in which part of the house was the council of the ancients.
26	16	To Sephim, and Hosa towards the west, by the gate which leadeth to the way of the ascent: ward against ward.
26	17	Now towards the east were six Levites: and towards the north four a day: and towards the south likewise four a day: and where the council was, two and two.
26	18	In the cells also of the porters toward the west four in the way: and two at every cell.
26	19	These are the divisions of the porters of the sons of Core, and of Merari.
26	20	Now Achias was over the treasures of the house of God, and the holy vessels.
26	21	The sons of Ledan, the sons of Gersonni: of Ledan were heads of the families, of Ledan, and Gersonni, Jehieli.
26	22	The sons of Jehieli: Zathan and Joel, his brethren over the treasures of the house of the Lord,
26	23	With the Amramites, and Isaarites, and Hebronites, and Ozielites.
26	24	And Subael the son of Gersom, the son of Moses, was chief over the treasures.
26	25	His brethren also, Eliezer, whose son Rohobia, and his son Isaias, and his son Joram, and his son Zechri, and his son Selemith.
26	26	Which Selemith and his brethren were over the treasures of the holy things, which king David, and the heads of families, and the captains over thousands and over hundreds, and the captains of the host had dedicated,
26	27	Out of the wars, and the spoils won in battles, which they had consecrated to the building and furniture of the temple of the Lord.
26	28	And all these things that Samuel the seer and Saul the son of Cis, and Abner the son of Ner, and Joab the son of Sarvia had sanctified: and whosoever had sanctified those things, they were under the hand of Selemith and his brethren.
26	29	But Chonenias and his sons were over the Isaarites, for the business abroad over Israel to teach them and judge them.
26	30	And of the Hebronites Hasabias, and his brethren most able men, a thousand seven hundred had the charge over Israel beyond the Jordan westward, in all the works of the Lord, and for the service of the king.
26	31	And the chief of the Hebronites was Jeria according to their families and kindreds. In the fortieth year of the reign of David they were numbered, and there were found most valiant men in Jazer Galaad,
26	32	And his brethren of stronger age, two thousand seven hundred chiefs of families. And king David made them rulers over the Rubenites and the Gadites, and the half tribe of Manasses, for all the service of God, and the king.
27	1	Now the children of Israel according to their number, the heads of families, captains of thousands and of hundreds, and officers, that served the king according to their companies, who came in and went out every month in the year, under every chief were four and twenty thousand.
27	2	Over the first company the first month Jesboam, the son of Zabdiel was chief, and under him were four and twenty thousand.
27	3	Of the sons of Phares, the chief of all the captains in the host in the first month.
27	4	The company of the second month was under Dudia, an Ahohite, and after him was another named Macelloth, who commanded a part of the army of four and twenty thousand.
27	5	And the captain of the third company for the third month, was Banaias the son of Joiada the priest: and in his division were four and twenty thousand.
27	6	This is that Banaias the most valiant among the thirty, and above the thirty. And Amizabad his son commanded his company.
27	7	The fourth, for the fourth month, was Asahel the brother of Joab, and Zabadias his son after him: and in his company were four and twenty thousand.
27	8	The fifth captain for the fifth month, was Samaoth a Jezerite: and his company were four and twenty thousand.
27	9	The sixth, for the sixth month, was Hira the son of Acces a Thecuite: and in his company were four and twenty thousand.
27	10	The seventh, for the seventh month, was Helles a Phallonite of the sons of Ephraim: and in his company were four and twenty thousand.
27	11	The eighth, for the eighth month, was Sobochai a Husathite of the race of Zarahi: and in his company were four and twenty thousand.
27	12	The ninth, for the ninth month, was Abiezer an Anathothite of the sons of Jemini, and in his company were four and twenty thousand.
27	13	The tenth, for the tenth month, was Marai, who was a Netophathite of the race of Zarai: and in his company were four and twenty thousand.
27	14	The eleventh, for the eleventh month, was Banaias, a Pharathonite of the sons of Ephraim: and in his company were four and twenty thousand.
27	15	The twelfth, for the twelfth month, was Holdai a Netophathite, of the race of Gothoniel: and in his company were four and twenty thousand.
27	16	Now the chiefs over the tribes of Israel were these: over the Rubenites, Eliezer the son of Zechri was ruler: over the Simeonites, Saphatias the son of Maacha:
27	17	Over the Levites, Hasabias the son of Camuel: over the Aaronites, Sadoc:
27	18	Over Juda, Eliu the brother of David over Issachar, Amri the son of Michael:
27	19	Over the Zabulonites, Jesmaias the son of Adias: over the Nephtalites, Jerimoth the son of Ozriel:
27	20	Over the sons of Ephraim, Osee the son of Ozaziu: over the half tribe of Manasses, Joel the son of Phadaia:
27	21	And over the half tribe of Manasses in Galaad, Jaddo the son of Zacharias: and over Benjamin, Jasiel the son of Abner.
27	22	And over Dan, Ezrihel the son of Jeroham: these were the princes of the children of Israel.
27	23	But David would not number them from twenty years old and under: because the lord had said that he would multiply Israel like the stars of heaven.
27	24	Joab the son of Sarvia began to number, but he finished not: because upon this there fell wrath upon Israel: and therefore the number of them that were numbered, was not registered in the chronicles of king David.
27	25	And over the king’s treasures was Azmoth the son of Adiel: and over those stores which were in the cities, and in the villages, and, in the castles, was Jonathan the son of Ozias.
27	26	And over the tillage, and the husbandmen, who tilled the ground, was Ezri the son of Chelub:
27	27	And over the dressers of the vine yards, was Semeias a Romathite: and over the wine cellars, Zabdias an Aphonite.
27	28	And over the oliveyards and the fig groves, which were in the plains, was Balanam a Gederite: and over the oil cellars, Joas.
27	29	And over the herds that fed in Saron, was Setrai a Saronite: and over the oxen in the valleys, Saphat the son of Adli:
27	30	And over the camels, Ubil an Ishmahelite and over the asses, Jadias a Meronathite:
27	31	And over the sheep Jaziz an Agarene. All these were the rulers of the substance of king David.
27	32	And Jonathan David’s uncle, a counsellor, a wise and learned man: he and Jahiel the son of Hachamoni were with the king’s sons.
27	33	And Achitophel was the king’s counsellor, and Chusai the Arachite, the king’s friend.
27	34	And after Achitophel was Joiada the son of Banaias, and Abiathar. And the general of the king’s army was Joab.
28	1	And David assembled all the chief men of Israel, the princes of the tribes, and the captains of the companies, who waited on the king: and the captains over thousands, and over hundreds, and them who had the charge over the substance and possessions of the king, and his sons with the officers of the court, and the men of power, and all the bravest of the army at Jerusalem.
28	2	And the king rising up, and standing said: Hear me, my brethren and my people: I had a thought to have built a house, in which the ark of the Lord, and the footstool of our God might rest: and prepared all things for the building.
28	3	And God said to me: Thou shalt not build a house to my name: because thou art a man of war, and hast shed blood.
28	4	But the Lord God of Israel chose me of all the house of my father, to be king over Israel for ever: for of Juda he chose the princes: and of the house of Juda, my father’s house: and among the sons of my father, it pleased him to choose me king over all Israel.
28	5	And among my sons (for the Lord hath given me many sons) he hath chosen Solomon my son, to sit upon the throne of the kingdom of the Lord over Israel.
28	6	And he said to me: Solomon thy son shall build my house, and my courts: for I have chosen him to be my son, and I will be a father to him.
28	7	And I will establish his kingdom for ever, it he continue to keep my commandments, and my judgments, as at this day.
28	8	Now then before all the assembly of Israel, in the hearing of our God, keep ye, and seek all the commandments of the Lord our God: that you may possess the good land, and may leave it to your children after you for ever.
28	9	And thou my son Solomon, know the God of thy father, and serve him with a perfect heart, and a willing mind: for the Lord searcheth all hearts, and understandeth all the thoughts of minds. If thou seek him, thou shalt find him: but if thou forsake him, he will cast thee off for ever.
28	10	Now therefore seeing the Lord hath chosen thee to build the house of the sanctuary, take courage, and do it.
28	11	And David gave to Solomon his son a description of the porch, and of the temple, and of the treasures, and of the upper floor, and of the inner chambers, and of the house for the mercy seat,
28	12	As also of all the courts, which he had in his thought, and of the chambers round about, for the treasures of the house of the Lord, and for the treasures of the consecrated things,
28	13	And of the divisions of the priests and of the Levites, for all the works of the house of the Lord, and for all the vessels of the service of the temple of the Lord.
28	14	Gold by weight for every vessel for the ministry. And silver by weight according to the diversity of the vessels and uses.
28	15	He gave also gold for the golden candlesticks, and their lamps, according to the dimensions of every candlestick, and the lamps thereof. In like manner also he gave silver by weight for the silver candlesticks, and for their lamps according to the diversity of the dimensions of them.
28	16	He gave also gold for the tables of proposition, according to the diversity of the tables: in like manner also silver for other tables of silver.
28	17	For fleshhooks also, and bowls, and censors of fine gold, and for little lions of gold, according to the measure he gave by weight, for every lion. In like manner also for lions of silver he set aside a different weight of silver.
28	18	And for the altar of incense, he gave the purest gold: and to make the likeness of the chariot of the cherubims spreading their wings, and covering the ark of the covenant of the Lord.
28	19	All these things, said he, came to me written by the hand of the Lord that I might understand all the works of the pattern.
28	20	And David said to Solomon his son: Act like a man, and take courage, and do: fear not, and be not dismayed: for the Lord my God will be with thee, and will not leave thee, nor forsake thee, till thou hast finished all the work for the service of the house of the Lord.
28	21	Behold the courses of the priests and the Levites, for every ministry of the house of the Lord, stand by thee, and are ready, and both the princes, and the people know how to execute all thy commandments.
29	1	And king David said to all the assembly: Solomon my son, whom alone God hath chosen, is as yet young and tender: and the work is great, for a house is prepared not for man, but for God.
29	2	And I with all my ability have prepared the expenses for the house of my God. Gold for vessels of gold, and silver for vessels of silver, brass for things of brass, iron for things of iron, wood for things of wood: and onyx stones, and stones like alabaster, and of divers colours, and all manner of precious stones, and marble of Paros in great abundance.
29	3	Now over and above the things which I have offered into the house of my God I give of my own proper goods, gold and silver for the temple of my God, beside what things I have prepared for the holy house.
29	4	Three thousand talents of gold of the gold of Ophir: and seven thousand talents of refined silver, to overlay the walls of the temple.
29	5	And gold for wheresoever there is need of gold: and silver for wheresoever there is need of silver, for the works to be made by the hands of the artificers: now if any man is willing to offer, let him fill his hand to day, and offer what he pleaseth to the Lord.
29	6	Then the heads of the families, and the princes of the tribes of Israel and the captains of thousands, and of hundreds, and the overseers of the king’s possessions promised,
29	7	And they gave for the works of the house of the Lord, of gold, five thousand talents, and ten thousand solids: of silver ten thousand talents: and of brass eighteen thousand talents: and of iron a hundred thousand talents.
29	8	And all they that had stones, gave them to the treasures of the house of the Lord, by the hand of Jahiel the Gersonite.
29	9	And the people rejoiced, when they promised their offerings willingly: because they offered them to the Lord with all their heart: and David the king rejoiced also with a great joy.
29	10	And he blessed the Lord before all the multitude, and he said: Blessed art thou, O Lord the God of Israel, our father from eternity to eternity.
29	11	Thine, O Lord, is magnificence, and power, and glory, and victory: and to thee is praise: for all that is in heaven, and in earth, is thine: thine is the kingdom, O Lord, and thou art above all princes.
29	12	Thine are riches, and thine is glory, thou hast dominion over all, in thy hand is power and might: in thy hand greatness, and the empire of all things.
29	13	Now therefore our God we give thanks to thee, and we praise thy glorious name.
29	14	Who am I, and what is my people, that we should be able to promise thee all these things? all things are thine: and we have given thee what we received of thy hand.
29	15	For we are sojourners before thee, and strangers, as were all our fathers. I Our days upon earth are as a shadow, and there is no stay.
29	16	O Lord our God, all this store that we have prepared to build thee a house for thy holy name, is from thy hand, and all things are thine.
29	17	I know my God that thou provest hearts, and lovest simplicity, wherefore I also in the simplicity of my heart, have joyfully offered all these things: and I have seen with great joy thy people, which are here present, offer thee their offerings.
29	18	O Lord God of Abraham, and of Isaac, and of Israel our fathers, keep for ever this will of their heart, and let this mind remain always for the worship of thee.
29	19	And give to Solomon my son a perfect heart, that he may keep thy commandments, thy testimonies, and thy ceremonies, and do all things: and build the house, for which I have provided the charges.
29	20	And David commanded all the assembly: Bless ye the Lord our God. And all the assembly blessed the Lord the God of their fathers: and they bowed themselves and worshipped God, and then the king.
29	21	And they sacrificed victims to the Lord: and they offered holocausts the next day, a thousand bullocks, a thousand rams, a thousand lambs, with their libations, and with every thing prescribed most abundantly for all Israel.
29	22	And they ate, and drank before the Lord that day with great joy. And they anointed the second time Solomon the son of David. And they anointed him to the Lord to be prince, and Sadoc to be high priest.
29	23	And Solomon sat on the throne of the Lord as king instead of David his father, and he pleased all: and all Israel obeyed him.
29	24	And all the princes, and men of power, and all the sons of king David gave their hand, and were subject to Solomon the king.
29	25	And the Lord magnified Solomon over all Israel: and gave him the glory of a reign, such as no king of Israel had before him.
29	26	So David the son of Isai reigned over all Israel.
29	27	And the days that he reigned over Israel, were forty years: in Hebron he reigned seven years, and in Jerusalem three and thirty years.
29	28	And he died in a good age, full of days, and riches, and glory. And Solomon his son reigned in his stead.
29	29	Now the acts of king David first and last are written in the book of Samuel the seer, and in the book of Nathan the prophet, and in the book of Gad the seer:
29	30	And of all his reign, and his valour, and of the times that passed under him, either in Israel, or in all the kingdoms of the countries.
